Illinois, session 104th, SB3443.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by changing Sections 605-300, 605-465, 605-503, and 7605-913 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 605/605-300)  (was 20 ILCS 605/46.2)9    Sec. 605-300. Economic development plans. The Department 10shall develop a strategic economic development plan for the 11State by July 1, 2014. By no later than January 31 July 1, 122015, and by July 1 annually thereafter, the Department shall 13make modifications to the plan as modifications are warranted 14by changes in economic conditions or by other factors, 15including changes in policy. In addition to the annual 16modification, the plan shall be reviewed and redeveloped in 17full every 5 years. In the development of the annual economic 18development plan, the Department shall consult with 19representatives of the private sector, other State agencies, 20academic institutions, local economic development 21organizations, local governments, and not-for-profit 22organizations. The annual economic development plan shall set 23specific, measurable, attainable, relevant, and time-sensitive   SB3443- 2 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1goals and shall include a focus on areas of high unemployment 2or poverty.3    The term "economic development" shall be construed broadly 4by the Department and may include, but is not limited to, job 5creation, job retention, tax base enhancements, development of 6human capital, workforce productivity, critical 7infrastructure, regional competitiveness, social inclusion, 8standard of living, environmental sustainability, energy 9independence, quality of life, the effective use of financial 10incentives, the utilization of public private partnerships 11where appropriate, and other metrics determined by the 12Department.13    The plan shall be based on relevant economic data, focus 14on economic development as prescribed by this Section, and 15emphasize strategies to retain and create jobs.16    The plan shall identify and develop specific strategies 17for utilizing the assets of regions within the State defined 18as counties and municipalities or other political subdivisions 19in close geographical proximity that share common economic 20traits such as commuting zones, labor market areas, or other 21economically integrated characteristics.22    If the plan includes strategies that have a fiscal impact 23on the Department or any other agency, the plan shall include a 24detailed description of the estimated fiscal impact of such 25strategies.26    Prior to publishing the plan in its final form, the   SB3443- 3 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Department shall allow for a reasonable time for public input.2    The Department shall transmit copies of the economic 3development plan to the Governor and the General Assembly no 4later than July 1, 2014, and by July 1 annually thereafter. The 5plan and its corresponding modifications shall be published 6and made available to the public in both paper and electronic 7media, on the Department's website, and by any other method 8that the Department deems appropriate.9    The Department shall annually submit legislation to 10implement the strategic economic development plan or 11modifications to the strategic economic development plan to 12the Governor, the President and Minority Leader of the Senate, 13and the Speaker and the Minority Leader of the House of 14Representatives. The legislation shall be in the form of one 15or more substantive bills drafted by the Legislative Reference 16Bureau.17(Source: P.A. 104-435, eff. 11-21-25.) 18    (20 ILCS 605/605-465)19    Sec. 605-465. Comprehensive website information.20    (a) The Department's official website must contain a 21comprehensive list of State, local, and federal economic 22benefits available to businesses in each of the State's 23counties and municipalities that the Department includes on 24its website. In order to do so:25        (1) The Department annually must request a summary of   SB3443- 4 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    available economic benefits from each of the State's 2    counties and municipalities that are linked to the 3    Department's website.4        (2) The information obtained under paragraph (1) must 5    be published on the related web pages of the Department's 6    website.7        (3) The Department's website shall also provide 8    information regarding available federal economic benefits 9    to the extent possible.10    (b) The Department shall adopt rules for the 11implementation of this Section.12    (c) This Section is repealed on July 1, 2026. 13(Source: P.A. 97-721, eff. 6-29-12.) 14    (20 ILCS 605/605-503)15    Sec. 605-503. Entrepreneurship assistance centers.16    (a) The Department shall establish and support, subject to 17appropriation, entrepreneurship assistance centers, including 18the issuance of grants, at career education agencies and 19not-for-profit corporations, including, but not limited to, 20local development corporations, chambers of commerce, 21community-based business outreach centers, and other 22community-based organizations. The purpose of the centers 23shall be to train minority group members, women, individuals 24with a disability, dislocated workers, veterans, and youth 25entrepreneurs in the principles and practice of   SB3443- 5 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1entrepreneurship in order to prepare those persons to pursue 2self-employment opportunities and to pursue a minority 3business enterprise or a women-owned business enterprise. The 4centers shall provide for training in all aspects of business 5development and small business management as defined by the 6Department.7    (b) The Department shall establish criteria for selection 8and designation of the centers which shall include, but not be 9limited to:10        (1) the level of support for the center from local 11    post-secondary education institutions, businesses, and 12    government;13        (2) the level of financial assistance provided at the 14    local and federal level to support the operations of the 15    center;16        (3) the applicant's understanding of program goals and 17    objectives articulated by the Department;18        (4) the plans of the center to supplement State and 19    local funding through fees for services which may be based 20    on a sliding scale based on ability to pay;21        (5) the need for and anticipated impact of the center 22    on the community in which it will function;23        (6) the quality of the proposed work plan and staff of 24    the center; and25        (7) the extent of economic distress in the area to be 26    served.  SB3443- 6 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    (c) Each center shall:2        (1) be operated by a board of directors representing 3    community leaders in business, education, finance, and 4    government;5        (2) be incorporated as a not-for-profit corporation;6        (3) be located in an area accessible to eligible 7    clients;8        (4) establish an advisory group of community business 9    experts, at least one-half of whom shall be representative 10    of the clientele to be served by the center, which shall 11    constitute a support network to provide counseling and 12    mentoring services to minority group members, women, 13    individuals with a disability, dislocated workers, 14    veterans, and youth entrepreneurs from the concept stage 15    of development through the first one to 2 years of 16    existence on a regular basis and as needed thereafter; and17        (5) establish a referral system and linkages to 18    existing area small business assistance programs and 19    financing sources.20    (d) Each entrepreneurship assistance center shall provide 21needed services to eligible clients, including, but not 22limited to: (i) orientation and screening of prospective 23entrepreneurs; (ii) analysis of business concepts and 24technical feasibility; (iii) market analysis; (iv) management 25analysis and counseling; (v) business planning and financial 26planning assistance; (vi) referrals to financial resources;   SB3443- 7 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1(vii) referrals to existing educational programs for training 2in such areas as marketing, accounting, and other training 3programs as may be necessary and available; and (viii) 4referrals to business incubator facilities, when appropriate, 5for the purpose of entering into agreements to access shared 6support services.7    (e) Applications for grants made under this Section shall 8be made in the manner and on forms prescribed by the 9Department. The application shall include, but shall not be 10limited to:11        (1) a description of the training programs available 12    within the geographic area to be served by the center to 13    which eligible clients may be referred;14        (2) designation of a program director;15        (3) plans for providing ongoing technical assistance 16    to program graduates, including linkages with providers of 17    other entrepreneurial assistance programs and with 18    providers of small business technical assistance and 19    services;20        (4) a program budget, including matching funds, 21    in-kind and otherwise, to be provided by the applicant; 22    and23        (5) any other requirements as deemed necessary by the 24    Department.25    (f) Grants made under this Section shall be disbursed for 26payment of the cost of services and expenses of the program   SB3443- 8 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1director, the instructors of the participating career 2education agency or not-for-profit corporation, the faculty 3and support personnel thereof, and any other person in the 4service of providing instruction and counseling in furtherance 5of the program.6    (g) The Department shall monitor the performance of each 7entrepreneurial assistance center and require quarterly 8reports from each center at such time and in such a manner as 9prescribed by the Department.10    The Department shall also evaluate the entrepreneurial 11assistance centers established under this Section and report 12annually beginning on January 1, 2023, and on or before 13January 31 January 1 of each year thereafter, the results of 14the evaluation to the Governor and the General Assembly. The 15report shall discuss the extent to which the centers serve 16minority group members, women, individuals with a disability, 17dislocated workers, veterans, and youth entrepreneurs; the 18extent to which the training program is coordinated with other 19assistance programs targeted to small and new businesses; the 20ability of the program to leverage other sources of funding 21and support; and the success of the program in aiding 22entrepreneurs to start up new businesses, including the number 23of new business start-ups resulting from the program. The 24report shall recommend changes and improvements in the 25training program and in the quality of supplemental technical 26assistance offered to graduates of the training programs. The   SB3443- 9 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1report shall be made available to the public on the 2Department's website. Between evaluation due dates, the 3Department shall maintain the necessary records and data 4required to satisfy the evaluation requirements.5    (h) For purposes of this Section:6    "Entrepreneurship assistance center" or "center" means the 7business development centers or programs which provide 8assistance to primarily minority group members, women, 9individuals with a disability, dislocated workers, veterans, 10and youth entrepreneurs under this Section.11    "Disability" means, with respect to an individual: (i) a 12physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or 13more of the major life activities of an individual; (ii) a 14record of such an impairment; or (iii) being regarded as 15having an impairment.16    "Minority business enterprise" has the same meaning as 17provided for "minority-owned business" under Section 2 of the 18Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 19Disabilities Act.20    "Minority group member" has the same meaning as provided 21for "minority person" under Section 2 of the Business 22Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 23Disabilities Act.24    "Women-owned business enterprise" has the same meaning as 25provided for "women-owned business" under Section 2 of the 26Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with   SB3443- 10 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Disabilities Act.2    "Veteran" means a person who served in and who has 3received an honorable or general discharge from, the United 4States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marines, Coast 5Guard, or reserves thereof, or who served in the Army National 6Guard, Air National Guard, or Illinois National Guard.7    "Youth entrepreneur" means a person who is between the 8ages of 16 and 29 years old and is seeking community support to 9start a business in Illinois. 10(Source: P.A. 102-272, eff. 1-1-22; 102-821, eff. 1-1-23; 11103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    (20 ILCS 605/605-913)13    Sec. 605-913. Clean Water Workforce Pipeline Program.14    (a) The General Assembly finds the following: 15        (1) The fresh surface water and groundwater supply in 16    Illinois and Lake Michigan constitute vital natural 17    resources that require careful stewardship and protection 18    for future generations. Access to safe and clean drinking 19    water is the right of all Illinois residents.20        (2) To adequately protect these resources and provide 21    safe and clean drinking water, substantial investment is 22    needed to replace lead components in drinking water 23    infrastructure, improve wastewater treatment, flood 24    control, and stormwater management, control aquatic 25    invasive species, implement green infrastructure   SB3443- 11 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    solutions, and implement other infrastructure solutions to 2    protect water quality.3        (3) Implementing these clean water solutions will 4    require a skilled and trained workforce, and new 5    investments will demand additional workers with 6    specialized skills.7        (4) Water infrastructure jobs have been shown to 8    provide living wages and contribute to Illinois' economy.9        (5) Significant populations of Illinois residents, 10    including, but not limited to, residents of environmental 11    justice communities, economically and socially 12    disadvantaged communities, those returning from the 13    criminal justice system, foster care alumni, and in 14    particular women and transgender persons, are in need of 15    access to skilled living wage jobs like those in the water 16    infrastructure sector.17        (6) Many of these residents are more likely to live in 18    communities with aging and inadequate clean water 19    infrastructure and suffer from threats to surface and 20    drinking water quality.21        (7) The State can provide significant economic 22    opportunities to these residents and achieve greater 23    environmental and public health by investing in clean 24    water infrastructure.25        (8) New training, recruitment, support, and placement 26    efforts are needed to connect these residents with career   SB3443- 12 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    opportunities in water infrastructure.2        (9) The State must invest in both clean water 3    infrastructure and workforce development efforts in order 4    to achieve these goals. 5    (b) Subject to appropriation, From appropriations made 6from the Build Illinois Bond Fund, Capital Development Fund, 7or General Revenue Fund or other funds as identified by the 8Department, the Department may shall create a Clean Water 9Workforce Pipeline Program to provide grants and other 10financial assistance to prepare and support individuals for 11careers in water infrastructure. All funding provided by the 12Program under this Section shall be designed to encourage and 13facilitate employment in projects funded through State capital 14investment and provide participants a skill set to allow them 15to work professionally in fields related to water 16infrastructure. 17    Grants and other financial assistance may be made 18available on a competitive annual basis to organizations that 19demonstrate a capacity to recruit, support, train, and place 20individuals in water infrastructure careers, including, but 21not limited to, community organizations, educational 22institutions, workforce investment boards, community action 23agencies, and multi-craft labor organizations for new efforts 24specifically focused on engaging residents of environmental 25justice communities, economically and socially disadvantaged 26communities, those returning from the criminal justice system,   SB3443- 13 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1foster care alumni, and in particular women and transgender 2persons in these populations. 3    Grants and other financial assistance may shall be awarded 4on a competitive and annual basis for the following 5activities: 6        (1) identification of individuals for job training in 7    the water sector;8        (2) counseling, preparation, skills training, and 9    other support to increase a candidate's likelihood of 10    success in a job training program and career;11        (3) financial support for individuals in a water 12    sector job skills training program, support services, and 13    transportation assistance tied to training under this 14    Section;15        (4) job placement services for individuals during and 16    after completion of water sector job skills training 17    programs; and18        (5) financial, administrative, and management 19    assistance for organizations engaged in these activities. 20    (c) It shall be an annual goal of the Program to train and 21place at least 300, or 25% of the number of annual jobs created 22by State financed water infrastructure projects, whichever is 23greater, of the following persons in water sector-related 24apprenticeships annually: residents of environmental justice 25communities; residents of economically and socially 26disadvantaged communities; those returning from the criminal   SB3443- 14 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1justice system; foster care alumni; and, in particular, women 2and transgender persons. In awarding and administering grants 3under this Program, the Department shall strive to provide 4assistance equitably throughout the State.5    In order to encourage the employment of individuals 6trained through the Program onto projects receiving State 7financial assistance, the Department shall coordinate with the 8Illinois Environmental Protection Agency, the Illinois Finance 9Authority, and other State agencies that provide financial 10support for water infrastructure projects. These agencies 11shall take steps to support attaining the training and 12placement goals set forth in this subsection, using a list of 13projects that receive State financial support. These agencies 14may propose and adopt rules to facilitate the attainment of 15this goal.16    Using funds appropriated for the purposes of this Section, 17the Department may select through a competitive bidding 18process a Program Administrator to oversee the allocation of 19funds and select organizations that receive funding.20    The Department may require recipients of grants under this 21Program to Recipients of grants under the Program shall report 22annually to the Department, at intervals determined by the 23Department, on the success of their efforts and their 24contribution to reaching the goals of the Program provided in 25this subsection. To the extent possible based on reporting 26provided by recipients of grants under this Program, the The   SB3443- 15 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Department shall compile this information and periodically 2annually report to the General Assembly on the Program, 3including, but not limited to, the following information:4        (1) progress toward the goals stated in this 5    subsection;6        (2) any increase in the percentage of water industry 7    jobs in targeted populations;8        (3) any increase in the rate of acceptance, 9    completion, or retention of water training programs among 10    targeted populations;11        (4) any increase in the rate of employment, including 12    hours and annual income, measured against pre-Program 13    participant income; and14        (5) any recommendations for future changes to optimize 15    the success of the Program. 16    (d) Within 180 days after an appropriation is made 17available for the purposes of meeting the requirements of this 18Act, Within 90 days after January 1, 2020 (the effective date 19of Public Act 101-576), the Department shall propose rules for 20adoption a draft plan to implement this Section in accordance 21with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, including any 22public comment required by the Joint Committee on 23Administrative Rules. for public comment. The Department shall 24allow a minimum of 60 days for public comment on the plan, 25including one or more public hearings, if requested. The 26Department shall finalize the plan within 180 days of January   SB3443- 16 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b11, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-576). 2    The Department may propose and adopt any rules necessary 3for the implementation of the Program and to ensure compliance 4with this Section. 5    (e) The Water Workforce Development Fund is created as a 6special fund in the State treasury. The Fund shall receive 7moneys appropriated for the purpose of this Section from the 8Build Illinois Bond Fund, the Capital Development Fund, the 9General Revenue Fund and any other funds. Moneys in the Fund 10shall only be used to fund the Program and to assist and enable 11implementation of clean water infrastructure capital 12investments. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 13the Water Workforce Development Fund is not subject to sweeps, 14administrative charge-backs, or any other fiscal or budgetary 15maneuver that would in any way transfer any amounts from the 16Water Workforce Development Fund into any other fund of the 17State. 18    (f) For purpose of this Section:19    "Environmental justice community" has the meaning provided 20in subsection (b) of Section 1-50 of the Illinois Power Agency 21Act.22    "Multi-craft labor organization" means a joint 23labor-management apprenticeship program registered with and 24approved by the United States Department of Labor's Office of 25Apprenticeship or a labor organization that has an accredited 26training program through the Higher Learning Commission or the   SB3443- 17 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Illinois Community College Board.2    "Organization" means a corporation, company, partnership, 3association, society, order, labor organization, or individual 4or aggregation of individuals. 5(Source: P.A. 101-576, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 6    Section 10. The Illinois Enterprise Zone Act is amended by 7changing Sections 12-9 and 12-9 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 655/12-9)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 626)9    Sec. 12-9. Report. On January 31 January 1 of each year, 10the Department shall report on its operation of the Fund for 11the preceding fiscal year to the Governor and the General 12Assembly. For any fiscal year in which no operations are 13conducted by the Department because no funds were appropriated 14to the Fund, the report outlined by this Section is not 15required. 16(Source: P.A. 102-108, eff. 1-1-22.) 17    Section 15. The Illinois Power Agency Act is amended by 18changing Section 1-130 as follows: 19    (20 ILCS 3855/1-130)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)21    Sec. 1-130. Home rule preemption. 22    (a) The authorization to impose any new taxes or fees   SB3443- 18 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1specifically related to the generation of electricity by, the 2capacity to generate electricity by, or the emissions into the 3atmosphere by electric generating facilities after the 4effective date of this Act is an exclusive power and function 5of the State. A home rule unit may not levy any new taxes or 6fees specifically related to the generation of electricity by, 7the capacity to generate electricity by, or the emissions into 8the atmosphere by electric generating facilities after the 9effective date of this Act. This Section is a denial and 10limitation on home rule powers and functions under subsection 11(g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.12    (b) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2033. January 131, 2028.14(Source: P.A. 103-563, eff. 11-17-23; 103-1059, eff. 12-20-24; 15104-434, eff. 11-21-25.) 16    Section 20. The Opportunities for At-Risk Women Act is 17amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 18    (20 ILCS 5075/15)19    Sec. 15. Annual report. On or before January 31 January 1, 202018, and on or before January 1 of each year thereafter, the 21Task Force shall report to the Governor and the General 22Assembly on its activities and shall include any 23recommendations for legislation or rulemaking to facilitate 24its work in the targeted areas of assistance and outsourcing.   SB3443- 19 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1(Source: P.A. 99-416, eff. 1-1-16; 100-295, eff. 8-24-17.) 2    Section 25. The Urban Weatherization Initiative Act is 3amended by changing Sections 40-40 and 40-45 as follows: 4    (30 ILCS 738/40-40)5    Sec. 40-40. Weatherization Initiative Board. 6    (a) Subject to appropriation, the The Weatherization 7Initiative Board is created within the Department. The Board 8must approve or deny all grants from the Fund.9    (a-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 10the Board has the authority to direct the Department to 11authorize the awarding of grants to applicants serving areas 12or populations not included in the target areas and 13populations set forth in Section 40-25 if the Board determines 14that there are special circumstances involving the areas or 15populations served by the applicant.16    (b) The Board shall consist of 5 voting members appointed 17by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The 18initial members shall have terms as follows as designated by 19the Governor: one for one year, one for 2 years, one for 3 20years, one for 4 years, and one for 5 years, or until a 21successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter, members 22shall serve 5-year terms or until a successor is appointed and 23qualified. The voting members shall elect a voting member to 24serve as chair for a one-year term. Vacancies shall be filled   SB3443- 20 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1in the same manner for the balance of a term. 2    (c) The Board shall also have 4 non-voting ex officio 3members appointed as follows: one Representative appointed by 4the Speaker of the House, one Representative appointed by the 5House Minority Leader, one Senator appointed by the President 6of the Senate, and one Senator appointed by the Senate 7Minority Leader, each to serve at the pleasure of the 8appointing authority.9    (d) Members shall receive no compensation, but may be 10reimbursed for necessary expenses from appropriations to the 11Department available for that purpose.12    (e) The Board may adopt rules under the Illinois 13Administrative Procedure Act.14    (f) A quorum of the Board is at least 3 voting members, and 15the affirmative vote of at least 3 voting members is required 16for Board decisions and adoption of rules.17    (g) The Department shall provide staff and administrative 18assistance to the Board. 19    (h) By January 31 December 31 of each year, the Board shall 20file an annual report with the Governor and the General 21Assembly concerning the Initiative, grants awarded, and 22grantees and making recommendations for any changes needed to 23enhance the effectiveness of the Initiative.24(Source: P.A. 96-37, eff. 7-13-09.) 25    Section 30. The Build Illinois Act is amended by changing   SB3443- 21 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Sections 9-9 and 10-9 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 750/9-9)  (from Ch. 127, par. 2709-9)3    Sec. 9-9. Annual Report. On January 31 January 1 of each 4year, the Department shall report on its operations of the 5Illinois Capital Revolving Loan Fund and the Illinois Equity 6Fund for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor and the 7General Assembly.8(Source: P.A. 84-109.) 9    (30 ILCS 750/10-9)  (from Ch. 127, par. 2710-9)10    Sec. 10-9. Report. On January 31 January 1 of each year, 11the Department shall report on its operation of the Fund for 12the preceding fiscal year to the Governor and the General 13Assembly.14(Source: P.A. 84-109.) 15    Section 35. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 16changing Sections 201, 220, 221, and 231 as follows: 17    (35 ILCS 5/201)18    Sec. 201. Tax imposed. 19    (a) In general. A tax measured by net income is hereby 20imposed on every individual, corporation, trust and estate for 21each taxable year ending after July 31, 1969 on the privilege 22of earning or receiving income in or as a resident of this   SB3443- 22 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1State. Such tax shall be in addition to all other occupation or 2privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 3corporation or political subdivision thereof.4    (b) Rates. The tax imposed by subsection (a) of this 5Section shall be determined as follows, except as adjusted by 6subsection (d-1):7        (1) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 8    taxable years ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount 9    equal to 2 1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the 10    taxable year.11        (2) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 12    taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending 13    after June 30, 1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 2 14    1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 15    July 1, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 16    3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 17    30, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.18        (3) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 19    taxable years beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending 20    prior to January 1, 2011, an amount equal to 3% of the 21    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.22        (4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 23    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and 24    ending after December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum 25    of (i) 3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 26    to January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and   SB3443- 23 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    (ii) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 2    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5.3        (5) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 4    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, 5    and ending prior to January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 5% 6    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.7        (5.1) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 8    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and 9    ending after December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum 10    of (i) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 11    to January 1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 12    (ii) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 13    after December 31, 2014, as calculated under Section 14    202.5. 15        (5.2) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 16    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, 17    and ending prior to July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 3.75% 18    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 19        (5.3) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 20    for taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and 21    ending after June 30, 2017, an amount equal to the sum of 22    (i) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 23    prior to July 1, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, 24    and (ii) 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 25    after June 30, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 26        (5.4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate,   SB3443- 24 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2017, an 2    amount equal to 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the 3    taxable year. 4        (6) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 5    ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount equal to 4% of the 6    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.7        (7) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 8    beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending after June 30, 9    1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4% of the 10    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 11    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 4.8% of 12    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30, 13    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.14        (8) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 15    beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending prior to January 16    1, 2011, an amount equal to 4.8% of the taxpayer's net 17    income for the taxable year.18        (9) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 19    beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and ending after 20    December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4.8% 21    of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 22    January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 23    (ii) 7% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 24    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5. 25        (10) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 26    beginning on or after January 1, 2011, and ending prior to   SB3443- 25 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 7% of the taxpayer's 2    net income for the taxable year. 3        (11) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 4    beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and ending after 5    December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 7% of 6    the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to January 7    1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 5.25% 8    of the taxpayer's net income for the period after December 9    31, 2014, as calculated under Section 202.5. 10        (12) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 11    beginning on or after January 1, 2015, and ending prior to 12    July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 5.25% of the taxpayer's 13    net income for the taxable year. 14        (13) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 15    beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and ending after June 30, 16    2017, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 5.25% of the 17    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 18    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 7% of 19    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30, 20    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 21        (14) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 22    beginning on or after July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 7% 23    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 24    The rates under this subsection (b) are subject to the 25provisions of Section 201.5. 26    (b-5) Surcharge; sale or exchange of assets, properties,   SB3443- 26 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1and intangibles of organization gaming licensees. For each of 2taxable years 2019 through 2027, a surcharge is imposed on all 3taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 4capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 5used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles (i) 6of an organization licensee under the Illinois Horse Racing 7Act of 1975 and (ii) of an organization gaming licensee under 8the Illinois Gambling Act. The amount of the surcharge is 9equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 10taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 11surcharge imposed shall not apply if: 12        (1) the organization gaming license, organization 13    license, or racetrack property is transferred as a result 14    of any of the following:15            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 16        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 17        licensee or the substantial owners of the initial 18        licensee;19            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 20        any such license by the Illinois Gaming Board or the 21        Illinois Racing Board;22            (C) a determination by the Illinois Gaming Board 23        that transfer of the license is in the best interests 24        of Illinois gaming;25            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 26        a licensee;  SB3443- 27 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in 2        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 3        publicly traded company;4            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly 5        owned subsidiary; or6            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 7        another person where both persons were initial owners 8        of the license when the license was issued; or 9        (2) the controlling interest in the organization 10    gaming license, organization license, or racetrack 11    property is transferred in a transaction to lineal 12    descendants in which no gain or loss is recognized or as a 13    result of a transaction in accordance with Section 351 of 14    the Internal Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is 15    recognized; or16        (3) live horse racing was not conducted in 2010 at a 17    racetrack located within 3 miles of the Mississippi River 18    under a license issued pursuant to the Illinois Horse 19    Racing Act of 1975. 20    The transfer of an organization gaming license, 21organization license, or racetrack property by a person other 22than the initial licensee to receive the organization gaming 23license is not subject to a surcharge. The Department shall 24adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this 25subsection. 26    (c) Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax.   SB3443- 28 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Beginning on July 1, 1979 and thereafter, in addition to such 2income tax, there is also hereby imposed the Personal Property 3Tax Replacement Income Tax measured by net income on every 4corporation (including Subchapter S corporations), partnership 5and trust, for each taxable year ending after June 30, 1979. 6Such taxes are imposed on the privilege of earning or 7receiving income in or as a resident of this State. The 8Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax shall be in 9addition to the income tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 10of this Section and in addition to all other occupation or 11privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 12corporation or political subdivision thereof.13    (d) Additional Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 14Tax Rates. The personal property tax replacement income tax 15imposed by this subsection and subsection (c) of this Section 16in the case of a corporation, other than a Subchapter S 17corporation and except as adjusted by subsection (d-1), shall 18be an additional amount equal to 2.85% of such taxpayer's net 19income for the taxable year, except that beginning on January 201, 1981, and thereafter, the rate of 2.85% specified in this 21subsection shall be reduced to 2.5%, and in the case of a 22partnership, trust or a Subchapter S corporation shall be an 23additional amount equal to 1.5% of such taxpayer's net income 24for the taxable year.25    (d-1) Rate reduction for certain foreign insurers. In the 26case of a foreign insurer, as defined by Section 35A-5 of the   SB3443- 29 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Illinois Insurance Code, whose state or country of domicile 2imposes on insurers domiciled in Illinois a retaliatory tax 3(excluding any insurer whose premiums from reinsurance assumed 4are 50% or more of its total insurance premiums as determined 5under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 304, except 6that for purposes of this determination premiums from 7reinsurance do not include premiums from inter-affiliate 8reinsurance arrangements), beginning with taxable years ending 9on or after December 31, 1999, the sum of the rates of tax 10imposed by subsections (b) and (d) shall be reduced (but not 11increased) to the rate at which the total amount of tax imposed 12under this Act, net of all credits allowed under this Act, 13shall equal (i) the total amount of tax that would be imposed 14on the foreign insurer's net income allocable to Illinois for 15the taxable year by such foreign insurer's state or country of 16domicile if that net income were subject to all income taxes 17and taxes measured by net income imposed by such foreign 18insurer's state or country of domicile, net of all credits 19allowed or (ii) a rate of zero if no such tax is imposed on 20such income by the foreign insurer's state of domicile. For 21the purposes of this subsection (d-1), an inter-affiliate 22includes a mutual insurer under common management.23        (1) For the purposes of subsection (d-1), in no event 24    shall the sum of the rates of tax imposed by subsections 25    (b) and (d) be reduced below the rate at which the sum of:26            (A) the total amount of tax imposed on such   SB3443- 30 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        foreign insurer under this Act for a taxable year, net 2        of all credits allowed under this Act, plus3            (B) the privilege tax imposed by Section 409 of 4        the Illinois Insurance Code, the fire insurance 5        company tax imposed by Section 12 of the Fire 6        Investigation Act, and the fire department taxes 7        imposed under Section 11-10-1 of the Illinois 8        Municipal Code,9    equals 1.25% for taxable years ending prior to December 10    31, 2003, or 1.75% for taxable years ending on or after 11    December 31, 2003, of the net taxable premiums written for 12    the taxable year, as described by subsection (1) of 13    Section 409 of the Illinois Insurance Code. This paragraph 14    will in no event increase the rates imposed under 15    subsections (b) and (d).16        (2) Any reduction in the rates of tax imposed by this 17    subsection shall be applied first against the rates 18    imposed by subsection (b) and only after the tax imposed 19    by subsection (a) net of all credits allowed under this 20    Section other than the credit allowed under subsection (i) 21    has been reduced to zero, against the rates imposed by 22    subsection (d).23    This subsection (d-1) is exempt from the provisions of 24Section 250.25    (e) Investment credit. A taxpayer shall be allowed a 26credit against the Personal Property Tax Replacement Income   SB3443- 31 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Tax for investment in qualified property.2        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit equal to .5% 3    of the basis of qualified property placed in service 4    during the taxable year, provided such property is placed 5    in service on or after July 1, 1984. There shall be allowed 6    an additional credit equal to .5% of the basis of 7    qualified property placed in service during the taxable 8    year, provided such property is placed in service on or 9    after July 1, 1986, and the taxpayer's base employment 10    within Illinois has increased by 1% or more over the 11    preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's employment 12    records filed with the Illinois Department of Employment 13    Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois shall be 14    deemed to have met the 1% growth in base employment for the 15    first year in which they file employment records with the 16    Illinois Department of Employment Security. The provisions 17    added to this Section by Public Act 85-1200 (and restored 18    by Public Act 87-895) shall be construed as declaratory of 19    existing law and not as a new enactment. If, in any year, 20    the increase in base employment within Illinois over the 21    preceding year is less than 1%, the additional credit 22    shall be limited to that percentage times a fraction, the 23    numerator of which is .5% and the denominator of which is 24    1%, but shall not exceed .5%. The investment credit shall 25    not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 26    taxpayer's liability in any tax year below zero, nor may   SB3443- 32 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    any credit for qualified property be allowed for any year 2    other than the year in which the property was placed in 3    service in Illinois. For tax years ending on or after 4    December 31, 1987, and on or before December 31, 1988, the 5    credit shall be allowed for the tax year in which the 6    property is placed in service, or, if the amount of the 7    credit exceeds the tax liability for that year, whether it 8    exceeds the original liability or the liability as later 9    amended, such excess may be carried forward and applied to 10    the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the 11    excess credit years if the taxpayer (i) makes investments 12    which cause the creation of a minimum of 2,000 full-time 13    equivalent jobs in Illinois, (ii) is located in an 14    enterprise zone established pursuant to the Illinois 15    Enterprise Zone Act and (iii) is certified by the 16    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 17    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity) as 18    complying with the requirements specified in clause (i) 19    and (ii) by July 1, 1986. The Department of Commerce and 20    Community Affairs (now Department of Commerce and Economic 21    Opportunity) shall notify the Department of Revenue of all 22    such certifications immediately. For tax years ending 23    after December 31, 1988, the credit shall be allowed for 24    the tax year in which the property is placed in service, 25    or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 26    for that year, whether it exceeds the original liability   SB3443- 33 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    or the liability as later amended, such excess may be 2    carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 3    taxable years following the excess credit years. The 4    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 5    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 6    tax year that is available to offset a liability, earlier 7    credit shall be applied first.8        (2) The term "qualified property" means property 9    which:10            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 11        buildings and structural components of buildings and 12        signs that are real property, but not including land 13        or improvements to real property that are not a 14        structural component of a building such as 15        landscaping, sewer lines, local access roads, fencing, 16        parking lots, and other appurtenances;17            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 19        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 20        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 21        (e);22            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 23        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;24            (D) is used in Illinois by a taxpayer who is 25        primarily engaged in manufacturing, or in mining coal 26        or fluorite, or in retailing, or was placed in service   SB3443- 34 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        on or after July 1, 2006 in a River Edge Redevelopment 2        Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 3        Redevelopment Zone Act; and4            (E) has not previously been used in Illinois in 5        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for 6        the credit provided by this subsection (e) or 7        subsection (f).8        (3) For purposes of this subsection (e), 9    "manufacturing" means the material staging and production 10    of tangible personal property by procedures commonly 11    regarded as manufacturing, processing, fabrication, or 12    assembling which changes some existing material into new 13    shapes, new qualities, or new combinations. For purposes 14    of this subsection (e) the term "mining" shall have the 15    same meaning as the term "mining" in Section 613(c) of the 16    Internal Revenue Code. For purposes of this subsection 17    (e), the term "retailing" means the sale of tangible 18    personal property for use or consumption and not for 19    resale, or services rendered in conjunction with the sale 20    of tangible personal property for use or consumption and 21    not for resale. For purposes of this subsection (e), 22    "tangible personal property" has the same meaning as when 23    that term is used in the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 24    and, for taxable years ending after December 31, 2008, 25    does not include the generation, transmission, or 26    distribution of electricity.  SB3443- 35 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        (4) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 2    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 3    income tax purposes.4        (5) If the basis of the property for federal income 5    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 6    placed in service in Illinois by the taxpayer, the amount 7    of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 8    service on the date of such increase in basis.9        (6) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 10    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.11        (7) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to 12    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within 13    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 14    any qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 15    months after being placed in service, the Personal 16    Property Tax Replacement Income Tax for such taxable year 17    shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined by 18    (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 19    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 20    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 21    property from such computation and, (ii) subtracting such 22    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 23    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (7), a 24    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 25    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 26    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent   SB3443- 36 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    of such reduction.2        (8) Unless the investment credit is extended by law, 3    the basis of qualified property shall not include costs 4    incurred after December 31, 2018, except for costs 5    incurred pursuant to a binding contract entered into on or 6    before December 31, 2018.7        (9) Each taxable year ending before December 31, 2000, 8    a partnership may elect to pass through to its partners 9    the credits to which the partnership is entitled under 10    this subsection (e) for the taxable year. A partner may 11    use the credit allocated to him or her under this 12    paragraph only against the tax imposed in subsections (c) 13    and (d) of this Section. If the partnership makes that 14    election, those credits shall be allocated among the 15    partners in the partnership in accordance with the rules 16    set forth in Section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, 17    and the rules promulgated under that Section, and the 18    allocated amount of the credits shall be allowed to the 19    partners for that taxable year. The partnership shall make 20    this election on its Personal Property Tax Replacement 21    Income Tax return for that taxable year. The election to 22    pass through the credits shall be irrevocable.23        For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 24    2000, a partner that qualifies its partnership for a 25    subtraction under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of 26    subsection (d) of Section 203 or a shareholder that   SB3443- 37 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    qualifies a Subchapter S corporation for a subtraction 2    under subparagraph (S) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) 3    of Section 203 shall be allowed a credit under this 4    subsection (e) equal to its share of the credit earned 5    under this subsection (e) during the taxable year by the 6    partnership or Subchapter S corporation, determined in 7    accordance with the determination of income and 8    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 9    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. This 10    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 250.11    (f) Investment credit; Enterprise Zone; River Edge 12Redevelopment Zone.13        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the 14    tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 15    investment in qualified property which is placed in 16    service in an Enterprise Zone created pursuant to the 17    Illinois Enterprise Zone Act or, for property placed in 18    service on or after July 1, 2006, a River Edge 19    Redevelopment Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 20    Redevelopment Zone Act. For partners, shareholders of 21    Subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 22    companies, if the liability company is treated as a 23    partnership for purposes of federal and State income 24    taxation, for taxable years ending before December 31, 25    2023, there shall be allowed a credit under this 26    subsection (f) to be determined in accordance with the   SB3443- 38 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    determination of income and distributive share of income 2    under Sections 702 and 704 and Subchapter S of the 3    Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years ending on or 4    after December 31, 2023, for partners and shareholders of 5    Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of Section 251 6    shall apply with respect to the credit under this 7    subsection. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such 8    property. The credit shall be available only in the 9    taxable year in which the property is placed in service in 10    the Enterprise Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone and 11    shall not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 12    taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by subsections 13    (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For tax years 14    ending on or after December 31, 1985, the credit shall be 15    allowed for the tax year in which the property is placed in 16    service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax 17    liability for that year, whether it exceeds the original 18    liability or the liability as later amended, such excess 19    may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of 20    the 5 taxable years following the excess credit year. The 21    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 22    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 23    tax year that is available to offset a liability, the 24    credit accruing first in time shall be applied first.25        (2) The term qualified property means property which:26            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including   SB3443- 39 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        buildings and structural components of buildings;2            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 4        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 5        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 6        (f);7            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 8        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;9            (D) is used in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 10        Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer; and11            (E) has not been previously used in Illinois in 12        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for 13        the credit provided by this subsection (f) or 14        subsection (e).15        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 16    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 17    income tax purposes.18        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income 19    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 20    placed in service in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 21    Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer, the amount of such 22    increase shall be deemed property placed in service on the 23    date of such increase in basis.24        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 25    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.26        (6) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to   SB3443- 40 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within 2    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 3    any qualified property is moved outside the Enterprise 4    Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone within 48 months 5    after being placed in service, the tax imposed under 6    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such taxable 7    year shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined 8    by (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 9    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 10    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 11    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 12    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 13    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 14    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 15    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 16    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 17    of such reduction.18        (7) There shall be allowed an additional credit equal 19    to 0.5% of the basis of qualified property placed in 20    service during the taxable year in a River Edge 21    Redevelopment Zone, provided such property is placed in 22    service on or after July 1, 2006, and the taxpayer's base 23    employment within Illinois has increased by 1% or more 24    over the preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's 25    employment records filed with the Illinois Department of 26    Employment Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois   SB3443- 41 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    shall be deemed to have met the 1% growth in base 2    employment for the first year in which they file 3    employment records with the Illinois Department of 4    Employment Security. If, in any year, the increase in base 5    employment within Illinois over the preceding year is less 6    than 1%, the additional credit shall be limited to that 7    percentage times a fraction, the numerator of which is 8    0.5% and the denominator of which is 1%, but shall not 9    exceed 0.5%. 10        (8) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 11    2021, there shall be allowed an Enterprise Zone 12    construction jobs credit against the taxes imposed under 13    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section as provided in 14    Section 13 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 15        The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 16    liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 17    credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may 18    be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's 19    liability in succeeding calendar years in the same manner 20    provided under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. 21    The credit or credits shall be applied to the earliest 22    year for which there is a tax liability. If there are 23    credits from more than one taxable year that are available 24    to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be applied 25    first. 26        For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S   SB3443- 42 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    corporations, and owners of limited liability companies, 2    if the liability company is treated as a partnership for 3    the purposes of federal and State income taxation, for 4    taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 5    be allowed a credit under this Section to be determined in 6    accordance with the determination of income and 7    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 8    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable 9    years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners 10    and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 11    provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 12    credit under this subsection.13        The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under 14    the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) 15    shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 16        This paragraph (8) is exempt from the provisions of 17    Section 250. 18    (g) (Blank).19    (h) Investment credit; High Impact Business.20        (1) Subject to subsections (b) and (b-5) of Section 21    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, a taxpayer shall 22    be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 23    (a) and (b) of this Section for investment in qualified 24    property which is placed in service by a Department of 25    Commerce and Economic Opportunity designated High Impact 26    Business. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such   SB3443- 43 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    property. The credit shall not be available (i) until the 2    minimum investments in qualified property set forth in 3    subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois 4    Enterprise Zone Act have been satisfied or (ii) until the 5    time authorized in subsection (b-5) of the Illinois 6    Enterprise Zone Act for entities designated as High Impact 7    Businesses under subdivisions (a)(3)(B), (a)(3)(C), and 8    (a)(3)(D) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 9    Act, and shall not be allowed to the extent that it would 10    reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 11    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. The 12    credit applicable to such investments shall be taken in 13    the taxable year in which such investments have been 14    completed. The credit for additional investments beyond 15    the minimum investment by a designated high impact 16    business authorized under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 17    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act shall be available 18    only in the taxable year in which the property is placed in 19    service and shall not be allowed to the extent that it 20    would reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 21    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For 22    tax years ending on or after December 31, 1987, the credit 23    shall be allowed for the tax year in which the property is 24    placed in service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds 25    the tax liability for that year, whether it exceeds the 26    original liability or the liability as later amended, such   SB3443- 44 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax 2    liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 3    credit year. The credit shall be applied to the earliest 4    year for which there is a liability. If there is credit 5    from more than one tax year that is available to offset a 6    liability, the credit accruing first in time shall be 7    applied first.8        Changes made in this subdivision (h)(1) by Public Act 9    88-670 restore changes made by Public Act 85-1182 and 10    reflect existing law.11        (2) The term qualified property means property which:12            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 13        buildings and structural components of buildings;14            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 15        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 16        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 17        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 18        (h);19            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 20        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code; and21            (D) is not eligible for the Enterprise Zone 22        Investment Credit provided by subsection (f) of this 23        Section.24        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 25    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 26    income tax purposes.  SB3443- 45 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income 2    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 3    placed in service in a federally designated Foreign Trade 4    Zone or Sub-Zone located in Illinois by the taxpayer, the 5    amount of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 6    service on the date of such increase in basis.7        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 8    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.9        (6) If during any taxable year ending on or before 10    December 31, 1996, any property ceases to be qualified 11    property in the hands of the taxpayer within 48 months 12    after being placed in service, or the situs of any 13    qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 14    months after being placed in service, the tax imposed 15    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such 16    taxable year shall be increased. Such increase shall be 17    determined by (i) recomputing the investment credit which 18    would have been allowed for the year in which credit for 19    such property was originally allowed by eliminating such 20    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 21    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 22    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 23    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 24    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 25    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 26    of such reduction.  SB3443- 46 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        (7) Beginning with tax years ending after December 31, 2    1996, if a taxpayer qualifies for the credit under this 3    subsection (h) and thereby is granted a tax abatement and 4    the taxpayer relocates its entire facility in violation of 5    the explicit terms and length of the contract under 6    Section 18-183 of the Property Tax Code, the tax imposed 7    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be 8    increased for the taxable year in which the taxpayer 9    relocated its facility by an amount equal to the amount of 10    credit received by the taxpayer under this subsection (h).11    (h-5) High Impact Business construction jobs credit. For 12taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, there 13shall also be allowed a High Impact Business construction jobs 14credit against the tax imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 15of this Section as provided in subsections (i) and (j) of 16Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 17    The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 18liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 19credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may be 20carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's liability 21in succeeding calendar years in the manner provided under 22paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or credits 23shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 24liability. If there are credits from more than one taxable 25year that are available to offset a liability, the earlier 26credit shall be applied first.   SB3443- 47 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, 2and owners of limited liability companies, for taxable years 3ending before December 31, 2023, if the liability company is 4treated as a partnership for the purposes of federal and State 5income taxation, there shall be allowed a credit under this 6Section to be determined in accordance with the determination 7of income and distributive share of income under Sections 702 8and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For 9taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for 10partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 11provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 12credit under this subsection.13    The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under the 14Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) shall not 15exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 16    This subsection (h-5) is exempt from the provisions of 17Section 250. 18    (i) Credit for Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 19Tax. For tax years ending prior to December 31, 2003, a credit 20shall be allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 21and (b) of this Section for the tax imposed by subsections (c) 22and (d) of this Section. This credit shall be computed by 23multiplying the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 24Section by a fraction, the numerator of which is base income 25allocable to Illinois and the denominator of which is Illinois 26base income, and further multiplying the product by the tax   SB3443- 48 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1rate imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section.2    Any credit earned on or after December 31, 1986 under this 3subsection which is unused in the year the credit is computed 4because it exceeds the tax liability imposed by subsections 5(a) and (b) for that year (whether it exceeds the original 6liability or the liability as later amended) may be carried 7forward and applied to the tax liability imposed by 8subsections (a) and (b) of the 5 taxable years following the 9excess credit year, provided that no credit may be carried 10forward to any year ending on or after December 31, 2003. This 11credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for which 12there is a liability. If there is a credit under this 13subsection from more than one tax year that is available to 14offset a liability the earliest credit arising under this 15subsection shall be applied first.16    If, during any taxable year ending on or after December 1731, 1986, the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 18Section for which a taxpayer has claimed a credit under this 19subsection (i) is reduced, the amount of credit for such tax 20shall also be reduced. Such reduction shall be determined by 21recomputing the credit to take into account the reduced tax 22imposed by subsections (c) and (d). If any portion of the 23reduced amount of credit has been carried to a different 24taxable year, an amended return shall be filed for such 25taxable year to reduce the amount of credit claimed.26    (j) Training expense credit. Beginning with tax years   SB3443- 49 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1ending on or after December 31, 1986 and prior to December 31, 22003, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 3imposed by subsections (a) and (b) under this Section for all 4amounts paid or accrued, on behalf of all persons employed by 5the taxpayer in Illinois or Illinois residents employed 6outside of Illinois by a taxpayer, for educational or 7vocational training in semi-technical or technical fields or 8semi-skilled or skilled fields, which were deducted from gross 9income in the computation of taxable income. The credit 10against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) shall be 111.6% of such training expenses. For partners, shareholders of 12subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 13companies, if the liability company is treated as a 14partnership for purposes of federal and State income taxation, 15for taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 16be allowed a credit under this subsection (j) to be determined 17in accordance with the determination of income and 18distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 and 19subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years 20ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners and 21shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of 22Section 251 shall apply with respect to the credit under this 23subsection.24    Any credit allowed under this subsection which is unused 25in the year the credit is earned may be carried forward to each 26of the 5 taxable years following the year for which the credit   SB3443- 50 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1is first computed until it is used. This credit shall be 2applied first to the earliest year for which there is a 3liability. If there is a credit under this subsection from 4more than one tax year that is available to offset a liability, 5the earliest credit arising under this subsection shall be 6applied first. No carryforward credit may be claimed in any 7tax year ending on or after December 31, 2003.8    (k) Research and development credit. For tax years ending 9after July 1, 1990 and prior to December 31, 2003, and 10beginning again for tax years ending on or after December 31, 112004, and ending prior to January 1, 2032, a taxpayer shall be 12allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 13and (b) of this Section for increasing research activities in 14this State. The credit allowed against the tax imposed by 15subsections (a) and (b) shall be equal to 6 1/2% of the 16qualifying expenditures for increasing research activities in 17this State. For partners, shareholders of subchapter S 18corporations, and owners of limited liability companies, if 19the liability company is treated as a partnership for purposes 20of federal and State income taxation, for taxable years ending 21before December 31, 2023, there shall be allowed a credit 22under this subsection to be determined in accordance with the 23determination of income and distributive share of income under 24Sections 702 and 704 and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue 25Code. For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, 26for partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations,   SB3443- 51 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 2credit under this subsection.3    For purposes of this subsection, "qualifying expenditures" 4means the qualifying expenditures as defined for the federal 5credit for increasing research activities which would be 6allowable under Section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code and 7which are conducted in this State, "qualifying expenditures 8for increasing research activities in this State" means the 9excess of qualifying expenditures for the taxable year in 10which incurred over qualifying expenditures for the base 11period, "qualifying expenditures for the base period" means 12the average of the qualifying expenditures for each year in 13the base period, and "base period" means the 3 taxable years 14immediately preceding the taxable year for which the 15determination is being made.16    Any credit in excess of the tax liability for the taxable 17year may be carried forward. A taxpayer may elect to have the 18unused credit shown on its final completed return carried over 19as a credit against the tax liability for the following 5 20taxable years or until it has been fully used, whichever 21occurs first; provided that no credit earned in a tax year 22ending prior to December 31, 2003 may be carried forward to any 23year ending on or after December 31, 2003.24    If an unused credit is carried forward to a given year from 252 or more earlier years, that credit arising in the earliest 26year will be applied first against the tax liability for the   SB3443- 52 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1given year. If a tax liability for the given year still 2remains, the credit from the next earliest year will then be 3applied, and so on, until all credits have been used or no tax 4liability for the given year remains. Any remaining unused 5credit or credits then will be carried forward to the next 6following year in which a tax liability is incurred, except 7that no credit can be carried forward to a year which is more 8than 5 years after the year in which the expense for which the 9credit is given was incurred.10    No inference shall be drawn from Public Act 91-644 in 11construing this Section for taxable years beginning before 12January 1, 1999.13    It is the intent of the General Assembly that the research 14and development credit under this subsection (k) shall apply 15continuously for all tax years ending on or after December 31, 162004 and ending prior to January 1, 2032, including, but not 17limited to, the period beginning on January 1, 2016 and ending 18on July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 100-22). All 19actions taken in reliance on the continuation of the credit 20under this subsection (k) by any taxpayer are hereby 21validated. 22    (l) Environmental Remediation Tax Credit.23        (i) For tax years ending after December 31, 1997 and 24    on or before December 31, 2001, a taxpayer shall be 25    allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 26    (a) and (b) of this Section for certain amounts paid for   SB3443- 53 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs, as specified in 2    this subsection. For purposes of this Section, 3    "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" means costs 4    approved by the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 5    ("Agency") under Section 58.14 of the Environmental 6    Protection Act that were paid in performing environmental 7    remediation at a site for which a No Further Remediation 8    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 9    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 10    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval 11    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit 12    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 13    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 14    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 15    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 16    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 17    of the Environmental Protection Act. After the Pollution 18    Control Board rules are adopted pursuant to the Illinois 19    Administrative Procedure Act for the administration and 20    enforcement of Section 58.9 of the Environmental 21    Protection Act, determinations as to credit availability 22    for purposes of this Section shall be made consistent with 23    those rules. For purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" 24    includes a person whose tax attributes the taxpayer has 25    succeeded to under Section 381 of the Internal Revenue 26    Code and "related party" includes the persons disallowed a   SB3443- 54 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    deduction for losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of 2    Section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of 3    being a related taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. 4    The credit allowed against the tax imposed by subsections 5    (a) and (b) shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed 6    eligible remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site, 7    except that the $100,000 threshold shall not apply to any 8    site contained in an enterprise zone as determined by the 9    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 10    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity). The 11    total credit allowed shall not exceed $40,000 per year 12    with a maximum total of $150,000 per site. For partners 13    and shareholders of subchapter S corporations, there shall 14    be allowed a credit under this subsection to be determined 15    in accordance with the determination of income and 16    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 17    and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code.18        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 19    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 20    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 21    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. The 22    term "unused credit" does not include any amounts of 23    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs in excess of the 24    maximum credit per site authorized under paragraph (i). 25    This credit shall be applied first to the earliest year 26    for which there is a liability. If there is a credit under   SB3443- 55 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    this subsection from more than one tax year that is 2    available to offset a liability, the earliest credit 3    arising under this subsection shall be applied first. A 4    credit allowed under this subsection may be sold to a 5    buyer as part of a sale of all or part of the remediation 6    site for which the credit was granted. The purchaser of a 7    remediation site and the tax credit shall succeed to the 8    unused credit and remaining carry-forward period of the 9    seller. To perfect the transfer, the assignor shall record 10    the transfer in the chain of title for the site and provide 11    written notice to the Director of the Illinois Department 12    of Revenue of the assignor's intent to sell the 13    remediation site and the amount of the tax credit to be 14    transferred as a portion of the sale. In no event may a 15    credit be transferred to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or a 16    related party would not be eligible under the provisions 17    of subsection (i).18        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 19    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 20    Environmental Protection Act.21    (m) Education expense credit. Beginning with tax years 22ending after December 31, 1999, a taxpayer who is the 23custodian of one or more qualifying pupils shall be allowed a 24credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 25this Section for qualified education expenses incurred on 26behalf of the qualifying pupils. The credit shall be equal to   SB3443- 56 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b125% of qualified education expenses, but in no event may the 2total credit under this subsection claimed by a family that is 3the custodian of qualifying pupils exceed (i) $500 for tax 4years ending prior to December 31, 2017, and (ii) $750 for tax 5years ending on or after December 31, 2017. In no event shall a 6credit under this subsection reduce the taxpayer's liability 7under this Act to less than zero. Notwithstanding any other 8provision of law, for taxable years beginning on or after 9January 1, 2017, no taxpayer may claim a credit under this 10subsection (m) if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the 11taxable year exceeds (i) $500,000, in the case of spouses 12filing a joint federal tax return or (ii) $250,000, in the case 13of all other taxpayers. This subsection is exempt from the 14provisions of Section 250 of this Act.15    For purposes of this subsection:16    "Qualifying pupils" means individuals who (i) are 17residents of the State of Illinois, (ii) are under the age of 1821 at the close of the school year for which a credit is 19sought, and (iii) during the school year for which a credit is 20sought were full-time pupils enrolled in a kindergarten 21through twelfth grade education program at any school, as 22defined in this subsection.23    "Qualified education expense" means the amount incurred on 24behalf of a qualifying pupil in excess of $250 for tuition, 25book fees, and lab fees at the school in which the pupil is 26enrolled during the regular school year.  SB3443- 57 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    "School" means any public or nonpublic elementary or 2secondary school in Illinois that is in compliance with Title 3VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and attendance at which 4satisfies the requirements of Section 26-1 of the School Code, 5except that nothing shall be construed to require a child to 6attend any particular public or nonpublic school to qualify 7for the credit under this Section.8    "Custodian" means, with respect to qualifying pupils, an 9Illinois resident who is a parent, the parents, a legal 10guardian, or the legal guardians of the qualifying pupils.11    (n) River Edge Redevelopment Zone site remediation tax 12credit. 13        (i) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 14    2006, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 15    imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 16    certain amounts paid for unreimbursed eligible remediation 17    costs, as specified in this subsection. For purposes of 18    this Section, "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" 19    means costs approved by the Illinois Environmental 20    Protection Agency ("Agency") under Section 58.14a of the 21    Environmental Protection Act that were paid in performing 22    environmental remediation at a site within a River Edge 23    Redevelopment Zone for which a No Further Remediation 24    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 25    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 26    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval   SB3443- 58 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit 2    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 3    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 4    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 5    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 6    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 7    of the Environmental Protection Act. Determinations as to 8    credit availability for purposes of this Section shall be 9    made consistent with rules adopted by the Pollution 10    Control Board pursuant to the Illinois Administrative 11    Procedure Act for the administration and enforcement of 12    Section 58.9 of the Environmental Protection Act. For 13    purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" includes a person 14    whose tax attributes the taxpayer has succeeded to under 15    Section 381 of the Internal Revenue Code and "related 16    party" includes the persons disallowed a deduction for 17    losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of Section 267 18    of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of being a related 19    taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. The credit 20    allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 21    shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed eligible 22    remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site.23        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 24    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 25    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 26    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. This   SB3443- 59 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for 2    which there is a liability. If there is a credit under this 3    subsection from more than one tax year that is available 4    to offset a liability, the earliest credit arising under 5    this subsection shall be applied first. A credit allowed 6    under this subsection may be sold to a buyer as part of a 7    sale of all or part of the remediation site for which the 8    credit was granted. The purchaser of a remediation site 9    and the tax credit shall succeed to the unused credit and 10    remaining carry-forward period of the seller. To perfect 11    the transfer, the assignor shall record the transfer in 12    the chain of title for the site and provide written notice 13    to the Director of the Illinois Department of Revenue of 14    the assignor's intent to sell the remediation site and the 15    amount of the tax credit to be transferred as a portion of 16    the sale. In no event may a credit be transferred to any 17    taxpayer if the taxpayer or a related party would not be 18    eligible under the provisions of subsection (i).19        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 20    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 21    Environmental Protection Act.22    (o) For each of taxable years during the Compassionate Use 23of Medical Cannabis Program, a surcharge is imposed on all 24taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 25capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 26used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles of   SB3443- 60 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1an organization registrant under the Compassionate Use of 2Medical Cannabis Program Act. The amount of the surcharge is 3equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 4taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 5surcharge imposed does not apply if:6        (1) the medical cannabis cultivation center 7    registration, medical cannabis dispensary registration, or 8    the property of a registration is transferred as a result 9    of any of the following:10            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 11        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 12        registration or the substantial owners of the initial 13        registration;14            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 15        any registration by the Illinois Department of Public 16        Health;17            (C) a determination by the Illinois Department of 18        Public Health that transfer of the registration is in 19        the best interests of Illinois qualifying patients as 20        defined by the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 21        Program Act;22            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 23        a registrant;24            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in 25        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 26        publicly traded company;  SB3443- 61 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly 2        owned subsidiary; or3            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 4        another person where both persons were initial owners 5        of the registration when the registration was issued; 6        or7        (2) the cannabis cultivation center registration, 8    medical cannabis dispensary registration, or the 9    controlling interest in a registrant's property is 10    transferred in a transaction to lineal descendants in 11    which no gain or loss is recognized or as a result of a 12    transaction in accordance with Section 351 of the Internal 13    Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is recognized.14    (p) Pass-through entity tax. 15        (1) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 16    2021 and beginning prior to January 1, 2037, a partnership 17    (other than a publicly traded partnership under Section 18    7704 of the Internal Revenue Code) or Subchapter S 19    corporation may elect to apply the provisions of this 20    subsection. A separate election shall be made for each 21    taxable year. Such election shall be made at such time, 22    and in such form and manner as prescribed by the 23    Department, and, once made, is irrevocable. 24        (2) Entity-level tax. A partnership or Subchapter S 25    corporation electing to apply the provisions of this 26    subsection shall be subject to a tax for the privilege of   SB3443- 62 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    earning or receiving income in this State in an amount 2    equal to 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the 3    taxable year. 4        (3) Net income defined. 5            (A) In general. For purposes of paragraph (2), the 6        term net income has the same meaning as defined in 7        Section 202 of this Act, except that, for tax years 8        ending on or after December 31, 2023, a deduction 9        shall be allowed in computing base income for 10        distributions to a retired partner to the extent that 11        the partner's distributions are exempt from tax under 12        Section 203(a)(2)(F) of this Act. In addition, the 13        following modifications shall not apply: 14                (i) the standard exemption allowed under 15            Section 204; 16                (ii) the deduction for net losses allowed 17            under Section 207; 18                (iii) in the case of an S corporation, the 19            modification under Section 203(b)(2)(S); and 20                (iv) in the case of a partnership, the 21            modifications under Section 203(d)(2)(H) and 22            Section 203(d)(2)(I). 23            (B) Special rule for tiered partnerships. If a 24        taxpayer making the election under paragraph (1) is a 25        partner of another taxpayer making the election under 26        paragraph (1), net income shall be computed as   SB3443- 63 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        provided in subparagraph (A), except that the taxpayer 2        shall subtract its distributive share of the net 3        income of the electing partnership (including its 4        distributive share of the net income of the electing 5        partnership derived as a distributive share from 6        electing partnerships in which it is a partner). 7        (4) Credit for entity level tax. Each partner or 8    shareholder of a taxpayer making the election under this 9    Section shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 10    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 11    for the taxable year of the partnership or Subchapter S 12    corporation for which an election is in effect ending 13    within or with the taxable year of the partner or 14    shareholder in an amount equal to 4.95% times the partner 15    or shareholder's distributive share of the net income of 16    the electing partnership or Subchapter S corporation, but 17    not to exceed the partner's or shareholder's share of the 18    tax imposed under paragraph (1) which is actually paid by 19    the partnership or Subchapter S corporation. If the 20    taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S corporation that 21    is itself a partner of a partnership making the election 22    under paragraph (1), the credit under this paragraph shall 23    be allowed to the taxpayer's partners or shareholders (or 24    if the partner is a partnership or Subchapter S 25    corporation then its partners or shareholders) in 26    accordance with the determination of income and   SB3443- 64 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 2    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. If the 3    amount of the credit allowed under this paragraph exceeds 4    the partner's or shareholder's liability for tax imposed 5    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 6    for the taxable year, such excess shall be treated as an 7    overpayment for purposes of Section 909 of this Act. 8        (5) Nonresidents. A nonresident individual who is a 9    partner or shareholder of a partnership or Subchapter S 10    corporation for a taxable year for which an election is in 11    effect under paragraph (1) shall not be required to file 12    an income tax return under this Act for such taxable year 13    if the only source of net income of the individual (or the 14    individual and the individual's spouse in the case of a 15    joint return) is from an entity making the election under 16    paragraph (1) and the credit allowed to the partner or 17    shareholder under paragraph (4) equals or exceeds the 18    individual's liability for the tax imposed under 19    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act for the 20    taxable year.21        (6) Liability for tax. Except as provided in this 22    paragraph, a partnership or Subchapter S making the 23    election under paragraph (1) is liable for the 24    entity-level tax imposed under paragraph (2). If the 25    electing partnership or corporation fails to pay the full 26    amount of tax deemed assessed under paragraph (2), the   SB3443- 65 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    partners or shareholders shall be liable to pay the tax 2    assessed (including penalties and interest). Each partner 3    or shareholder shall be liable for the unpaid assessment 4    based on the ratio of the partner's or shareholder's share 5    of the net income of the partnership over the total net 6    income of the partnership. If the partnership or 7    Subchapter S corporation fails to pay the tax assessed 8    (including penalties and interest) and thereafter an 9    amount of such tax is paid by the partners or 10    shareholders, such amount shall not be collected from the 11    partnership or corporation. 12        (7) Foreign tax. For purposes of the credit allowed 13    under Section 601(b)(3) of this Act, tax paid by a 14    partnership or Subchapter S corporation to another state 15    which, as determined by the Department, is substantially 16    similar to the tax imposed under this subsection, shall be 17    considered tax paid by the partner or shareholder to the 18    extent that the partner's or shareholder's share of the 19    income of the partnership or Subchapter S corporation 20    allocated and apportioned to such other state bears to the 21    total income of the partnership or Subchapter S 22    corporation allocated or apportioned to such other state. 23        (8) Suspension of withholding. The provisions of 24    Section 709.5 of this Act shall not apply to a partnership 25    or Subchapter S corporation for the taxable year for which 26    an election under paragraph (1) is in effect.   SB3443- 66 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        (9) Requirement to pay estimated tax. For each taxable 2    year for which an election under paragraph (1) is in 3    effect, a partnership or Subchapter S corporation is 4    required to pay estimated tax for such taxable year under 5    Sections 803 and 804 of this Act if the amount payable as 6    estimated tax can reasonably be expected to exceed $500. 7        (10) The provisions of this subsection shall apply 8    only with respect to taxable years for which the 9    limitation on individual deductions applies under Section 10    164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. 11(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-396, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-595, eff. 6-26-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 104-453, eff. 1312-12-25.) 14    (35 ILCS 5/220)15    Sec. 220. Angel investment credit.16    (a) As used in this Section: 17    "Applicant" means a corporation, partnership, limited 18liability company, or a natural person that makes an 19investment in a qualified new business venture. The term 20"applicant" does not include (i) a corporation, partnership, 21limited liability company, or a natural person who has a 22direct or indirect ownership interest of at least 51% in the 23profits, capital, or value of the qualified new business 24venture receiving the investment or (ii) a related member. 25    "Claimant" means an applicant certified by the Department   SB3443- 67 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1who files a claim for a credit under this Section. 2    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 3Opportunity. 4    "Investment" means money (or its equivalent) given to a 5qualified new business venture, at a risk of loss, in 6consideration for an equity interest of the qualified new 7business venture. The Department may adopt rules to permit 8certain forms of contingent equity investments to be 9considered eligible for a tax credit under this Section. 10    "Qualified new business venture" means a business that is 11registered with the Department under this Section. 12    "Related member" means a person that, with respect to the 13applicant, is any one of the following: 14        (1) An individual, if the individual and the members 15    of the individual's family (as defined in Section 318 of 16    the Internal Revenue Code) own directly, indirectly, 17    beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at 18    least 50% of the value of the outstanding profits, 19    capital, stock, or other ownership interest in the 20    qualified new business venture that is the recipient of 21    the applicant's investment. 22        (2) A partnership, estate, or trust and any partner or 23    beneficiary, if the partnership, estate, or trust and its 24    partners or beneficiaries own directly, indirectly, 25    beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at 26    least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or other   SB3443- 68 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    ownership interest in the qualified new business venture 2    that is the recipient of the applicant's investment. 3        (3) A corporation, and any party related to the 4    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution 5    of stock from the corporation under the attribution rules 6    of Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the 7    applicant and any other related member own, in the 8    aggregate, directly, indirectly, beneficially, or 9    constructively, at least 50% of the value of the 10    outstanding stock of the qualified new business venture 11    that is the recipient of the applicant's investment. 12        (4) A corporation and any party related to that 13    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution 14    of stock from the corporation to the party or from the 15    party to the corporation under the attribution rules of 16    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the 17    corporation and all such related parties own, in the 18    aggregate, at least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or 19    other ownership interest in the qualified new business 20    venture that is the recipient of the applicant's 21    investment. 22        (5) A person to or from whom there is attribution of 23    ownership of stock in the qualified new business venture 24    that is the recipient of the applicant's investment in 25    accordance with Section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue 26    Code, except that for purposes of determining whether a   SB3443- 69 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    person is a related member under this paragraph, "20%" 2    shall be substituted for "5%" whenever "5%" appears in 3    Section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue Code. 4    (b) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010, 5and ending on or before December 31, 2032 December 31, 2026, 6subject to the limitations provided in this Section, a 7claimant may claim, as a credit against the tax imposed under 8subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, an amount 9equal to 25% of the claimant's investment made directly in a 10qualified new business venture. However, the amount of the 11credit is 35% of the claimant's investment made directly in 12the qualified new business venture if the investment is made 13in: (1) a qualified new business venture that is a 14minority-owned business, a women-owned business, or a business 15owned a person with a disability (as those terms are used and 16defined in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 17Persons with Disabilities Act); or (2) a qualified new 18business venture in which the principal place of business is 19located in a county with a population of not more than 250,000. 20In order for an investment in a qualified new business venture 21to be eligible for tax credits, the business must have applied 22for and received certification under subsection (e) for the 23taxable year in which the investment was made prior to the date 24on which the investment was made. The credit under this 25Section may not exceed the taxpayer's Illinois income tax 26liability for the taxable year. If the amount of the credit   SB3443- 70 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may be 2carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 3taxable years following the excess credit year. The credit 4shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 5liability. If there are credits from more than one tax year 6that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 7shall be applied first. In the case of a partnership or 8Subchapter S Corporation, the credit is allowed to the 9partners or shareholders in accordance with the determination 10of income and distributive share of income under Sections 702 11and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. 12    (c) The minimum amount an applicant must invest in any 13single qualified new business venture in order to be eligible 14for a credit under this Section is $10,000. The maximum amount 15of an applicant's total investment made in any single 16qualified new business venture that may be used as the basis 17for a credit under this Section is $2,000,000. 18    (d) The Department shall implement a program to certify an 19applicant for an angel investment credit. Upon satisfactory 20review, the Department shall issue a tax credit certificate 21stating the amount of the tax credit to which the applicant is 22entitled. The Department shall annually certify that: (i) each 23qualified new business venture that receives an angel 24investment under this Section has maintained a minimum 25employment threshold, as defined by rule, in the State (and 26continues to maintain a minimum employment threshold in the   SB3443- 71 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1State for a period of no less than 3 years from the issue date 2of the last tax credit certificate issued by the Department 3with respect to such business pursuant to this Section); and 4(ii) the claimant's investment has been made and remains, 5except in the event of a qualifying liquidity event, in the 6qualified new business venture for no less than 3 years. 7    If an investment for which a claimant is allowed a credit 8under subsection (b) is held by the claimant for less than 3 9years, other than as a result of a permitted sale of the 10investment to person who is not a related member, the claimant 11shall pay to the Department of Revenue, in the manner 12prescribed by the Department of Revenue, the aggregate amount 13of the disqualified credits that the claimant received related 14to the subject investment. 15    If the Department determines that a qualified new business 16venture failed to maintain a minimum employment threshold in 17the State through the date which is 3 years from the issue date 18of the last tax credit certificate issued by the Department 19with respect to the subject business pursuant to this Section, 20except for any 3-year reporting period that includes March 13, 212020 to January 1, 2024, the claimant or claimants shall pay to 22the Department of Revenue, in the manner prescribed by the 23Department of Revenue, the aggregate amount of the 24disqualified credits that claimant or claimants received 25related to investments in that business. For tax credits under 26this Section involving a 3-year reporting period that includes   SB3443- 72 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1March 13, 2020 to January 1, 2024, the repayment of any tax 2credits issued shall be determined at the discretion of the 3Department. 4    (e) The Department shall implement a program to register 5qualified new business ventures for purposes of this Section. 6A business desiring registration under this Section shall be 7required to submit a full and complete application to the 8Department. A submitted application shall be effective only 9for the taxable year in which it is submitted, and a business 10desiring registration under this Section shall be required to 11submit a separate application in and for each taxable year for 12which the business desires registration. Further, if at any 13time prior to the acceptance of an application for 14registration under this Section by the Department one or more 15events occurs which makes the information provided in that 16application materially false or incomplete (in whole or in 17part), the business shall promptly notify the Department of 18the same. Any failure of a business to promptly provide the 19foregoing information to the Department may, at the discretion 20of the Department, result in a revocation of a previously 21approved application for that business, or disqualification of 22the business from future registration under this Section, or 23both. The Department may register the business only if all of 24the following conditions are satisfied: 25        (1) it has its principal place of business in this 26    State;   SB3443- 73 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        (2) at least 51% of the employees employed by the 2    business are employed in this State; 3        (3) the business has the potential for increasing jobs 4    in this State, increasing capital investment in this 5    State, or both, as determined by the Department, and 6    either of the following apply: 7            (A) it is principally engaged in innovation in any 8        of the following: manufacturing; biotechnology; 9        nanotechnology; communications; agricultural 10        sciences; clean energy creation or storage technology; 11        processing or assembling products, including medical 12        devices, pharmaceuticals, computer software, computer 13        hardware, semiconductors, other innovative technology 14        products, or other products that are produced using 15        manufacturing methods that are enabled by applying 16        proprietary technology; or providing services that are 17        enabled by applying proprietary technology; or 18            (B) it is undertaking pre-commercialization 19        activity related to proprietary technology that 20        includes conducting research, developing a new product 21        or business process, or developing a service that is 22        principally reliant on applying proprietary 23        technology; 24        (4) it is not principally engaged in real estate 25    development, insurance, banking, lending, lobbying, 26    political consulting, professional services provided by   SB3443- 74 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    attorneys, accountants, business consultants, physicians, 2    or health care consultants, wholesale or retail trade, 3    leisure, hospitality, transportation, or construction, 4    except construction of power production plants that derive 5    energy from a renewable energy resource, as defined in 6    Section 1 of the Illinois Power Agency Act;7        (5) at the time it is first certified: 8            (A) it has fewer than 100 employees; 9            (B) it has been in operation in Illinois for not 10        more than 10 consecutive years prior to the year of 11        certification; and12            (C) it has received not more than $10,000,000 in 13        aggregate investments; 14        (5.1) it agrees to maintain a minimum employment 15    threshold in the State of Illinois prior to the date which 16    is 3 years from the issue date of the last tax credit 17    certificate issued by the Department with respect to that 18    business pursuant to this Section; 19        (6) (blank); and 20        (7) it has received not more than $4,000,000 in 21    investments that qualified for tax credits under this 22    Section. 23    (f) The Department, in consultation with the Department of 24Revenue, shall adopt rules to administer this Section. For 25taxable years beginning before January 1, 2024, the aggregate 26amount of the tax credits that may be claimed under this   SB3443- 75 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Section for investments made in qualified new business 2ventures shall be limited to $10,000,000 per calendar year, of 3which $500,000 shall be reserved for investments made in 4qualified new business ventures which are minority-owned 5businesses, women-owned businesses, or businesses owned by a 6person with a disability (as those terms are used and defined 7in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons 8with Disabilities Act), and an additional $500,000 shall be 9reserved for investments made in qualified new business 10ventures with their principal place of business in counties 11with a population of not more than 250,000. For taxable years 12beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the aggregate amount of 13the tax credits that may be claimed under this Section for 14investments made in qualified new business ventures shall be 15limited to $15,000,000 per calendar year, of which $2,500,000 16shall be reserved for investments made in qualified new 17business ventures that are minority-owned businesses (as the 18term is defined in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 19Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act), $1,250,000 shall be 20reserved for investments made in qualified new business 21ventures that are women-owned businesses or businesses owned 22by a person with a disability (as those terms are defined in 23the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons 24with Disabilities Act), and $1,250,000 shall be reserved for 25investments made in qualified new business ventures with their 26principal place of business in a county with a population of   SB3443- 76 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1not more than 250,000. The annual allowable amounts set forth 2in this Section shall be allocated by the Department, on a per 3calendar quarter basis and prior to the commencement of each 4calendar year, in such proportion as determined by the 5Department, provided that: (i) the amount initially allocated 6by the Department for any one calendar quarter shall not 7exceed 35% of the total allowable amount; (ii) any portion of 8the allocated allowable amount remaining unused as of the end 9of any of the first 3 calendar quarters of a given calendar 10year shall be rolled into, and added to, the total allocated 11amount for the next available calendar quarter; and (iii) the 12reservation of tax credits for investments in minority-owned 13businesses, women-owned businesses, businesses owned by a 14person with a disability, and in businesses in counties with a 15population of not more than 250,000 is limited to the first 3 16calendar quarters of a given calendar year, after which they 17may be claimed by investors in any qualified new business 18venture. 19    (g) A claimant may not sell or otherwise transfer a credit 20awarded under this Section to another person. 21    (h) On or before March 1 of each year, the Department shall 22report to the Governor and to the General Assembly on the tax 23credit certificates awarded under this Section for the prior 24calendar year. 25        (1) This report must include, for each tax credit 26    certificate awarded:   SB3443- 77 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1            (A) the name of the claimant and the amount of 2        credit awarded or allocated to that claimant; 3            (B) the name and address (including the county) of 4        the qualified new business venture that received the 5        investment giving rise to the credit, the North 6        American Industry Classification System (NAICS) code 7        applicable to that qualified new business venture, and 8        the number of employees of the qualified new business 9        venture; and 10            (C) the date of approval by the Department of each 11        claimant's tax credit certificate. 12        (2) The report must also include: 13            (A) the total number of applicants and the total 14        number of claimants, including the amount of each tax 15        credit certificate awarded to a claimant under this 16        Section in the prior calendar year; 17            (B) the total number of applications from 18        businesses seeking registration under this Section, 19        the total number of new qualified business ventures 20        registered by the Department, and the aggregate amount 21        of investment upon which tax credit certificates were 22        issued in the prior calendar year; and 23            (C) the total amount of tax credit certificates 24        sought by applicants, the amount of each tax credit 25        certificate issued to a claimant, the aggregate amount 26        of all tax credit certificates issued in the prior   SB3443- 78 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        calendar year and the aggregate amount of tax credit 2        certificates issued as authorized under this Section 3        for all calendar years. 4    (i) For each business seeking registration under this 5Section after December 31, 2016, the Department shall require 6the business to include in its application the North American 7Industry Classification System (NAICS) code applicable to the 8business and the number of employees of the business at the 9time of application. Each business registered by the 10Department as a qualified new business venture that receives 11an investment giving rise to the issuance of a tax credit 12certificate pursuant to this Section shall, for each of the 3 13years following the issue date of the last tax credit 14certificate issued by the Department with respect to such 15business pursuant to this Section, report to the Department 16the following: 17        (1) the number of employees and the location at which 18    those employees are employed, both as of the end of each 19    year; 20        (2) the amount of additional new capital investment 21    raised as of the end of each year, if any; and 22        (3) the terms of any liquidity event occurring during 23    such year; for the purposes of this Section, a "liquidity 24    event" means any event that would be considered an exit 25    for an illiquid investment, including any event that 26    allows the equity holders of the business (or any material   SB3443- 79 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    portion thereof) to cash out some or all of their 2    respective equity interests. 3(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-9, eff. 1-1-24; 4103-945, eff. 8-9-24.) 5    (35 ILCS 5/221)6    Sec. 221. Rehabilitation costs; qualified historic 7properties; River Edge Redevelopment Zone.8    (a) For taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 92012 and begin prior to January 1, 2018, there shall be allowed 10a tax credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 11of Section 201 of this Act in an amount equal to 25% of 12qualified expenditures incurred by a qualified taxpayer during 13the taxable year in the restoration and preservation of a 14qualified historic structure located in a River Edge 15Redevelopment Zone pursuant to a qualified rehabilitation 16plan, provided that the total amount of such expenditures (i) 17must equal $5,000 or more and (ii) must exceed 50% of the 18purchase price of the property.19    (a-1) For taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 202018 and end prior to January 1, 2034 January 1, 2029, there 21shall be allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed by 22subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act in an 23aggregate amount equal to 25% of qualified expenditures 24incurred by a qualified taxpayer in the restoration and 25preservation of a qualified historic structure located in a   SB3443- 80 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1River Edge Redevelopment Zone pursuant to a qualified 2rehabilitation plan, provided that the total amount of such 3expenditures must (i) equal $5,000 or more and (ii) exceed the 4adjusted basis of the qualified historic structure on the 5first day the qualified rehabilitation plan begins. For any 6rehabilitation project, regardless of duration or number of 7phases, the project's compliance with the foregoing provisions 8(i) and (ii) shall be determined based on the aggregate amount 9of qualified expenditures for the entire project and may 10include expenditures incurred under subsection (a), this 11subsection, or both subsection (a) and this subsection. If the 12qualified rehabilitation plan spans multiple years, the 13aggregate credit for the entire project shall be allowed in 14the last taxable year, except for phased rehabilitation 15projects, which may receive credits upon completion of each 16phase. Before obtaining the first phased credit: (A) the total 17amount of such expenditures must meet the requirements of 18provisions (i) and (ii) of this subsection; (B) the 19rehabilitated portion of the qualified historic structure must 20be placed in service; and (C) the requirements of subsection 21(b) must be met.22    (a-2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 232021 and ending prior to January 1, 2029, there shall be 24allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed by subsections 25(a) and (b) of Section 201 as provided in Section 10-10.3 of 26the River Edge Redevelopment Zone Act. The credit allowed   SB3443- 81 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1under this subsection (a-2) shall apply only to taxpayers that 2make a capital investment of at least $1,000,000 in a 3qualified rehabilitation plan. 4    The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 5liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 6credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may be 7carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's liability 8in succeeding calendar years in the manner provided under 9paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or credits 10shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 11liability. If there are credits from more than one taxable 12year that are available to offset a liability, the earlier 13credit shall be applied first. 14    For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, 15and owners of limited liability companies, if the liability 16company is treated as a partnership for the purposes of 17federal and State income taxation, there shall be allowed a 18credit under this Section to be determined in accordance with 19the determination of income and distributive share of income 20under Sections 702 and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal 21Revenue Code. 22    The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under the 23Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of this amendatory Act of the 24101st General Assembly) shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any 25State fiscal year. 26    (b) To obtain a tax credit pursuant to this Section, the   SB3443- 82 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1taxpayer must apply with the Department of Natural Resources. 2The Department of Natural Resources shall determine the amount 3of eligible rehabilitation costs and expenses in addition to 4the amount of the River Edge construction jobs credit within 545 days of receipt of a complete application. The taxpayer 6must submit a certification of costs prepared by an 7independent certified public accountant that certifies (i) the 8project expenses, (ii) whether those expenses are qualified 9expenditures, and (iii) that the qualified expenditures exceed 10the adjusted basis of the qualified historic structure on the 11first day the qualified rehabilitation plan commenced. The 12Department of Natural Resources is authorized, but not 13required, to accept this certification of costs to determine 14the amount of qualified expenditures and the amount of the 15credit. The Department of Natural Resources shall provide 16guidance as to the minimum standards to be followed in the 17preparation of such certification. The Department of Natural 18Resources and the National Park Service shall determine 19whether the rehabilitation is consistent with the United 20States Secretary of the Interior's Standards for 21Rehabilitation. 22    (b-1) Upon completion of the project and approval of the 23complete application, the Department of Natural Resources 24shall issue a single certificate in the amount of the eligible 25credits equal to 25% of qualified expenditures incurred during 26the eligible taxable years, as defined in subsections (a) and   SB3443- 83 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1(a-1), excepting any credits awarded under subsection (a) 2prior to January 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 3100-629) and any phased credits issued prior to the eligible 4taxable year under subsection (a-1). At the time the 5certificate is issued, an issuance fee up to the maximum 6amount of 2% of the amount of the credits issued by the 7certificate may be collected from the applicant to administer 8the provisions of this Section. If collected, this issuance 9fee shall be deposited into the Historic Property 10Administrative Fund, a special fund created in the State 11treasury. Subject to appropriation, moneys in the Historic 12Property Administrative Fund shall be provided to the 13Department of Natural Resources as reimbursement for the costs 14associated with administering this Section. 15    (c) The taxpayer must attach the certificate to the tax 16return on which the credits are to be claimed. The tax credit 17under this Section may not reduce the taxpayer's liability to 18less than zero. If the amount of the credit exceeds the tax 19liability for the year, the excess credit may be carried 20forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 taxable years 21following the excess credit year. 22    (c-1) Subject to appropriation, moneys in the Historic 23Property Administrative Fund shall be used, on a biennial 24basis beginning at the end of the second fiscal year after 25January 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-629), to 26hire a qualified third party to prepare a biennial report to   SB3443- 84 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1assess the overall economic impact to the State from the 2qualified rehabilitation projects under this Section completed 3in that year and in previous years. The overall economic 4impact shall include at least: (1) the direct and indirect or 5induced economic impacts of completed projects; (2) temporary, 6permanent, and construction jobs created; (3) sales, income, 7and property tax generation before, during construction, and 8after completion; and (4) indirect neighborhood impact after 9completion. The report shall be submitted to the Governor and 10the General Assembly. The report to the General Assembly shall 11be filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the 12Secretary of the Senate in electronic form only, in the manner 13that the Clerk and the Secretary shall direct. 14    (c-2) The Department of Natural Resources may adopt rules 15to implement this Section in addition to the rules expressly 16authorized in this Section. 17    (d) As used in this Section, the following terms have the 18following meanings.19    "Phased rehabilitation" means a project that is completed 20in phases, as defined under Section 47 of the federal Internal 21Revenue Code and pursuant to National Park Service regulations 22at 36 C.F.R. 67. 23    "Placed in service" means the date when the property is 24placed in a condition or state of readiness and availability 25for a specifically assigned function as defined under Section 2647 of the federal Internal Revenue Code and federal Treasury   SB3443- 85 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Regulation Sections 1.46 and 1.48. 2    "Qualified expenditure" means all the costs and expenses 3defined as qualified rehabilitation expenditures under Section 447 of the federal Internal Revenue Code that were incurred in 5connection with a qualified historic structure. 6    "Qualified historic structure" means a certified historic 7structure as defined under Section 47(c)(3) of the federal 8Internal Revenue Code. 9    "Qualified rehabilitation plan" means a project that is 10approved by the Department of Natural Resources and the 11National Park Service as being consistent with the United 12States Secretary of the Interior's Standards for 13Rehabilitation. 14    "Qualified taxpayer" means the owner of the qualified 15historic structure or any other person who qualifies for the 16federal rehabilitation credit allowed by Section 47 of the 17federal Internal Revenue Code with respect to that qualified 18historic structure. Partners, shareholders of subchapter S 19corporations, and owners of limited liability companies (if 20the limited liability company is treated as a partnership for 21purposes of federal and State income taxation) are entitled to 22a credit under this Section to be determined in accordance 23with the determination of income and distributive share of 24income under Sections 702 and 703 and subchapter S of the 25Internal Revenue Code, provided that credits granted to a 26partnership, a limited liability company taxed as a   SB3443- 86 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1partnership, or other multiple owners of property shall be 2passed through to the partners, members, or owners 3respectively on a pro rata basis or pursuant to an executed 4agreement among the partners, members, or owners documenting 5any alternate distribution method. 6(Source: P.A. 104-434, eff. 11-21-25.) 7    (35 ILCS 5/231)8    Sec. 231. Apprenticeship education expense credit.9    (a) As used in this Section: 10    "Accredited training organization" means an organization 11that:12        (1) incurs costs related to training apprentice 13    employees; 14        (2) maintains an apprenticeship program approved by 15    the United States Department of Labor, Office of 16    Apprenticeships, that results in an industry-recognized 17    credential; and either 18        (3) is affiliated with a public or nonpublic secondary 19    school in Illinois and is:20                (A) an institution of higher education that 21        provides a program that leads to an 22        industry-recognized postsecondary credential or 23        degree;24                (B) an entity that carries out programs that 25        are registered under the federal National   SB3443- 87 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        Apprenticeship Act; or2                (C) a public or private provider of a program 3        of training services, including, but not limited to, a 4        joint labor-management organization; or 5        (4) is not affiliated with a public or nonpublic 6    secondary school in Illinois but receives preapproval from 7    the Department to receive tax credits under this Section. 8    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 9Opportunity. 10    "Employer" means an Illinois taxpayer who is the employer 11of the qualifying apprentice. 12    "Qualifying apprentice" means an individual who: (i) is a 13resident of the State of Illinois; (ii) is at least 16 years 14old at the close of the school year for which a credit is 15sought; (iii) during the school year for which a credit is 16sought, was a full-time apprentice enrolled in an 17apprenticeship program which is registered with the United 18States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship; and (iv) 19is employed in Illinois by the taxpayer who is the employer. 20    "Qualified education expense" means the amount incurred on 21behalf of a qualifying apprentice not to exceed $3,500 for 22tuition, instructional materials, fees (including, but not 23limited to, book, license, and lab fees), or other expenses 24that are directly related to training the apprentices and that 25are preapproved by the Department. All expenses must be paid 26to or incurred for training at the school, community college,   SB3443- 88 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1or organization where the apprentice receives training. 2    (b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 32020, and beginning on or before January 1, 2032 January 1, 42027, the employer of one or more qualifying apprentices shall 5be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 6and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. The 7credit shall be equal to $3,500 per qualifying apprentice. A 8taxpayer shall be entitled to an additional $1,500 credit 9against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 10201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act if (i) the qualifying 11apprentice resides in an underserved area as defined in 12Section 5-5 of the Economic Development for a Growing Economy 13Tax Credit Act during the school year for which a credit is 14sought by an employer or (ii) the employer's principal place 15of business is located in an underserved area, as defined in 16Section 5-5 of the Economic Development for a Growing Economy 17Tax Credit Act. In no event shall a credit under this Section 18reduce the taxpayer's liability under this Act to less than 19zero. For taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, for 20partners, shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, and 21owners of limited liability companies, if the liability 22company is treated as a partnership for purposes of federal 23and State income taxation, there shall be allowed a credit 24under this Section to be determined in accordance with the 25determination of income and distributive share of income under 26Sections 702 and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue   SB3443- 89 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Code. For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, 2partners and shareholders of subchapter S corporations are 3entitled to a credit under this Section as provided in Section 4251.5    (c) The Department shall implement a program to certify 6applicants for an apprenticeship credit under this Section. 7Upon satisfactory review, the Department shall issue a tax 8credit certificate to an employer incurring costs on behalf of 9a qualifying apprentice stating the amount of the tax credit 10to which the employer is entitled. If the employer is seeking a 11tax credit for multiple qualifying apprentices, the Department 12may issue a single tax credit certificate that encompasses the 13aggregate total of tax credits for qualifying apprentices for 14a single employer. 15    (d) The Department, in addition to those powers granted 16under the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, is granted 17and shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry 18out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this 19Section, including, but not limited to, power and authority 20to: 21        (1) Adopt rules deemed necessary and appropriate for 22    the administration of this Section; establish forms for 23    applications, notifications, contracts, or any other 24    agreements; and accept applications at any time during the 25    year and require that all applications be submitted via 26    the Internet. The Department shall require that   SB3443- 90 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    applications be submitted in electronic form. 2        (2) Provide guidance and assistance to applicants 3    pursuant to the provisions of this Section and cooperate 4    with applicants to promote, foster, and support job 5    creation within the State. 6        (3) Enter into agreements and memoranda of 7    understanding for participation of and engage in 8    cooperation with agencies of the federal government, units 9    of local government, universities, research foundations or 10    institutions, regional economic development corporations, 11    or other organizations for the purposes of this Section. 12        (4) Gather information and conduct inquiries, in the 13    manner and by the methods it deems desirable, including, 14    without limitation, gathering information with respect to 15    applicants for the purpose of making any designations or 16    certifications necessary or desirable or to gather 17    information in furtherance of the purposes of this Act. 18        (5) Establish, negotiate, and effectuate any term, 19    agreement, or other document with any person necessary or 20    appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this Section, 21    and consent, subject to the provisions of any agreement 22    with another party, to the modification or restructuring 23    of any agreement to which the Department is a party. 24        (6) Provide for sufficient personnel to permit 25    administration, staffing, operation, and related support 26    required to adequately discharge its duties and   SB3443- 91 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    responsibilities described in this Section from funds made 2    available through charges to applicants or from funds as 3    may be appropriated by the General Assembly for the 4    administration of this Section. 5        (7) Require applicants, upon written request, to issue 6    any necessary authorization to the appropriate federal, 7    State, or local authority or any other person for the 8    release to the Department of information requested by the 9    Department, including, but not be limited to, financial 10    reports, returns, or records relating to the applicant or 11    to the amount of credit allowable under this Section. 12        (8) Require that an applicant shall, at all times, 13    keep proper books of record and account in accordance with 14    generally accepted accounting principles consistently 15    applied, with the books, records, or papers related to the 16    agreement in the custody or control of the applicant open 17    for reasonable Department inspection and audits, 18    including, without limitation, the making of copies of the 19    books, records, or papers. 20        (9) Take whatever actions are necessary or appropriate 21    to protect the State's interest in the event of 22    bankruptcy, default, foreclosure, or noncompliance with 23    the terms and conditions of financial assistance or 24    participation required under this Section or any agreement 25    entered into under this Section, including the power to 26    sell, dispose of, lease, or rent, upon terms and   SB3443- 92 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    conditions determined by the Department to be appropriate, 2    real or personal property that the Department may recover 3    as a result of these actions. 4    (e) The Department, in consultation with the Department of 5Revenue, shall adopt rules to administer this Section. The 6aggregate amount of the tax credits that may be claimed under 7this Section for qualified education expenses incurred by an 8employer on behalf of a qualifying apprentice shall be limited 9to $5,000,000 per calendar year. If applications for a greater 10amount are received, credits shall be allowed on a first-come 11first-served basis, based on the date on which each properly 12completed application for a certificate of eligibility is 13received by the Department. If more than one certificate is 14received on the same day, the credits will be awarded based on 15the time of submission for that particular day. 16    (f) An employer may not sell or otherwise transfer a 17credit awarded under this Section to another person or 18taxpayer. 19    (g) The employer shall provide the Department such 20information as the Department may require, including, but not 21limited to: (i) the name, age, and identification number of 22each qualifying apprentice employed by the taxpayer during the 23taxable year; (ii) the amount of qualified education expenses 24incurred with respect to each qualifying apprentice; and (iii) 25the name of the accredited training organization at which the 26qualifying apprentice is enrolled and the qualified education   SB3443- 93 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1expenses are incurred. 2    (h) On or before July 1 of each year, the Department shall 3report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the tax 4credit certificates awarded under this Section for the prior 5calendar year. The report must include: 6        (1) the name of each employer awarded or allocated a 7    credit;8        (2) the number of qualifying apprentices for whom the 9    employer has incurred qualified education expenses;10        (3) the North American Industry Classification System 11    (NAICS) code applicable to each employer awarded or 12    allocated a credit;13        (4) the amount of the credit awarded or allocated to 14    each employer; 15        (5) the total number of employers awarded or allocated 16    a credit; 17        (6) the total number of qualifying apprentices for 18    whom employers receiving credits under this Section 19    incurred qualified education expenses; and 20        (7) the average cost to the employer of all 21    apprenticeships receiving credits under this Section. 22(Source: P.A. 103-396, eff. 1-1-24; 103-1059, eff. 12-20-24; 23104-6, eff. 6-16-25; 104-434, eff. 11-21-25.) 24    Section 40. The Southeastern Illinois Economic Development 25Authority Act is amended by changing Section 20 as follows:   SB3443- 94 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    (70 ILCS 518/20)2    Sec. 20. Creation. 3    (a) There is created a political subdivision, body 4politic, and municipal corporation named the Southeastern 5Illinois Economic Development Authority. The territorial 6jurisdiction of the Authority is that geographic area within 7the boundaries of the following counties: Fayette, Cumberland, 8Clark, Effingham, Jasper, Crawford, Marion, Clay, Richland, 9Lawrence, Jefferson, Wayne, Edwards, Wabash, Hamilton, and 10White; Irvington Township in Washington County; and any 11navigable waters and air space located therein. 12    (b) The governing and administrative powers of the 13Authority shall be vested in a body consisting of 26 public 27 14members and one ex officio member, as follows: 15        (1) Public members. Nine members shall be appointed by 16    the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. 17    The county board chairmen of the following counties shall 18    each appoint one member: Clark, Clay, Crawford, 19    Cumberland, Edwards, Effingham, Fayette, Hamilton, Jasper, 20    Jefferson, Lawrence, Marion, Richland, Wabash, Washington, 21    Wayne, and White. 22        (2) Ex officio member. The Director of Commerce and 23    Economic Opportunity, or his or her designee, shall serve 24    as an ex officio member. One member shall be appointed by 25    the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity.   SB3443- 95 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    All public members shall reside within the territorial 2jurisdiction of the Authority. The public members shall be 3persons of recognized ability and experience in one or more of 4the following areas: economic development, finance, banking, 5industrial development, state or local government, commercial 6agriculture, small business management, real estate 7development, community development, venture finance, organized 8labor, or civic or community organization. 9    (c) Fourteen members shall constitute a quorum, and the 10Board may not meet or take any action without a quorum present. 11    (d) The chairman of the Authority shall be elected 12annually by the Board. 13    (e) The terms of the initial members of the Authority 14shall begin 30 days after the effective date of this Act. Of 15the 10 original members appointed by the Governor and the 16Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity pursuant to 17subsection (b), one shall serve until the third Monday in 18January, 2005; one shall serve until the third Monday in 19January, 2006; 2 shall serve until the third Monday in 20January, 2007; 2 shall serve until the third Monday in 21January, 2008; 2 shall serve until the third Monday in 22January, 2009; and 2 shall serve until the third Monday in 23January, 2010. The terms of the initial public members of the 24Authority appointed by the county board chairmen shall begin 2530 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2697th General Assembly. The terms of the initial public members   SB3443- 96 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1appointed by the county board chairmen shall be determined by 2lot, according to the following schedule: (i) 4 shall serve 3until the third Monday in January, 2013, (ii) 4 shall serve 4until the third Monday in January, 2014, (iii) 3 shall serve 5until the third Monday in January, 2015, (iv) 3 shall serve 6until the third Monday in January, 2016, and (v) 3 shall serve 7until the third Monday in January, 2017. All successors to 8these initial members shall be appointed by the original 9appointing authority pursuant to subsection (b), and shall 10hold office for a term of 3 years commencing the third Monday 11in January of the year in which their term commences, except in 12the case of an appointment to fill a vacancy. Vacancies 13occurring among the members shall be filled for the remainder 14of the term. In case of a vacancy in a Governor-appointed 15membership when the Senate is not in session, the Governor may 16make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the 17Senate when a person shall be nominated to fill the office and, 18upon confirmation by the Senate, he or she shall hold office 19during the remainder of the term and until a successor is 20appointed and qualified. Members of the Authority are not 21entitled to compensation for their services as members but are 22entitled to reimbursement for all necessary expenses incurred 23in connection with the performance of their duties as members. 24Members of the Board may participate in Board meetings by 25teleconference or video conference.26    (f) The Governor may remove any public member of the   SB3443- 97 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Authority appointed by the Governor, and the Director of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity may remove any member 3appointed by the Director, in case of incompetence, neglect of 4duty, or malfeasance in office. The chairman of a county 5board, with the approval of a majority vote of the county 6board, may remove any public member appointed by that chairman 7in the case of incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance 8in office. 9    (g) The Board shall appoint an Executive Director who 10shall have a background in finance, including familiarity with 11the legal and procedural requirements of issuing bonds, real 12estate, or economic development and administration. The 13Executive Director shall hold office at the discretion of the 14Board. The Executive Director shall be the chief 15administrative and operational officer of the Authority, shall 16direct and supervise its administrative affairs and general 17management, perform such other duties as may be prescribed 18from time to time by the members, and receive compensation 19fixed by the Authority. The Executive Director shall attend 20all meetings of the Authority. However, no action of the 21Authority shall be invalid on account of the absence of the 22Executive Director from a meeting. The Authority may engage 23the services of the Illinois Finance Authority, attorneys, 24appraisers, engineers, accountants, credit analysts, and other 25consultants, if the Southeastern Illinois Economic Development 26Authority deems it advisable.   SB3443- 98 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1(Source: P.A. 103-517, eff. 8-11-23.) 2    Section 45. The Broadband Advisory Council Act is amended 3by changing Section 20 as follows: 4    (220 ILCS 80/20)5    Sec. 20. Powers and duties of the Council generally. 6    (a) The Council shall:7        (1) explore any and all ways to expand the 8    availability to end-user customers of broadband services 9    using available technologies, including, but not limited 10    to, wireline, wireless, fixed wireless, and satellite 11    applications;12        (2) identify barriers to broadband adoption among the 13    residents and small businesses of Illinois;14        (3) research ways to eliminate barriers to adoption 15    through measures such as: digital literacy programs; 16    programs to assist older citizens in using broadband 17    Internet access; programs to facilitate adoption by 18    disabled citizens; and programs to encourage collaborative 19    efforts among public universities, community colleges, 20    libraries, public housing, and other institutions; 21        (4) assess the availability of broadband for 22    low-income households compared to the availability of 23    broadband for other households;24        (5) explore the potential for increased use of   SB3443- 99 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    broadband service for the purposes of education, career 2    readiness, workforce preparation, and alternative career 3    training;4        (6) explore the potential for increased use of 5    broadband services to facilitate aging in place;6        (7) explore ways for encouraging State and municipal 7    agencies, including public housing authorities, to expand 8    the use of broadband services for the purpose of better 9    serving the public, including audio and video streaming, 10    voice-over Internet protocol, teleconferencing, and 11    wireless networking;12        (8) cooperate and assist in the expansion of 13    electronic instruction and distance education services; 14        (9) as the Federal Communications Commission updates 15    the benchmark downstream data rates and upstream data 16    rates, publish the revised data rates in the Illinois 17    Register within 60 days after the federal update; and18        (10) evaluate the expansion of the Illinois Century 19    Network to Illinois public schools, public libraries, and 20    State-owned correctional institutions or facilities, 21    including issuing recommendations for increasing agency 22    staffing, infrastructure development, price modeling, and 23    providing download speeds of at least one gigabyte per 24    second and upload speeds of at least one gigabyte per 25    second. 26    (b) In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this   SB3443- 100 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1Act, the Council is hereby granted the powers necessary to 2carry out the purpose and intent of this Act, as enumerated in 3this Section, including, but not limited to:4        (1) promoting awareness of public facilities that have 5    community broadband access that can be used for distance 6    education and workforce development; and7        (2) advising on deployment of e-government portals 8    such that all public bodies and political subdivisions 9    have websites and encourage one-stop government access and 10    that all public entities stream audio and video of all 11    public meetings. 12    (c) The Council shall also:13        (1) monitor the broadband-based development efforts of 14    other states in areas such as business, education, aging 15    in place, and health;16        (2)receive input provided on a voluntary basis from 17    all Illinois broadband stakeholders and advise the 18    Governor and the General Assembly on policies related to 19    broadband in Illinois, provided that no stakeholders shall 20    be required to publicly disclose competitively sensitive 21    information or information that could compromise network 22    security or undermine the efficacy of reasonable network 23    management practices, and that any such information 24    voluntarily disclosed shall be protected from public 25    disclosure; and26        (3) serve as the broadband advocate to State agencies   SB3443- 101 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    and other State entities to communicate the broadband 2    needs of citizens and organizations that do not have 3    access to broadband service or to broadband service 4    adequate for their needs. 5    (d) The Council shall exercise its powers and authority to 6(1) advise and make recommendations to the General Assembly 7and the Governor on bringing broadband service to unserved and 8underserved rural and urban areas and improving broadband 9service statewide, (2) advise and make recommendations to the 10General Assembly and the Governor on facilitating broadband 11adoption by all citizens, and (3) propose statutory changes 12that may enhance and expand broadband in the State. 13    (e) The Council shall report to the General Assembly on or 14before January 31 January 1 of each year. The report to the 15General Assembly shall be filed with the Clerk of the House of 16Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate in electronic 17form only, in the manner that the Clerk and the Secretary shall 18direct. The report shall include the action that was taken by 19the Council during the previous year in carrying out the 20provisions of this Act. The Council shall also make any other 21reports as may be required by the General Assembly or the 22Governor.23(Source: P.A. 103-483, eff. 8-4-23.) 24    Section 50. The Energy Assistance Act is amended by 25changing Section 5 as follows:   SB3443- 102 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    (305 ILCS 20/5)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1405)2    Sec. 5. Policy Advisory Council. 3    (a) Within the Department of Commerce and Economic 4Opportunity is created a Low Income Energy Assistance Policy 5Advisory Council.6    (b) The Council shall be chaired by the Director of 7Commerce and Economic Opportunity or his or her designee. 8There shall be 17 19 members of the Low Income Energy 9Assistance Policy Advisory Council, including the chairperson 10and the following members: 11        (1) one member designated by the Illinois Commerce 12    Commission; 13        (2) (blank); 14        (3) one member designated by the Illinois Energy 15    Association to represent electric public utilities serving 16    in excess of 1 million customers in this State; 17        (4) one member agreed upon by gas public utilities 18    that serve more than 500,000 and fewer than 1,500,000 19    customers in this State; 20        (5) one member agreed upon by gas public utilities 21    that serve 1,500,000 or more customers in this State; 22        (6) one member designated by the Illinois Energy 23    Association to represent combination gas and electric 24    public utilities; 25        (7) one member agreed upon by the Illinois Municipal   SB3443- 103 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    Electric Agency and the Association of Illinois Electric 2    Cooperatives; 3        (8) (blank); one member agreed upon by the Illinois 4    Industrial Energy Consumers; 5        (9) three members designated by the Department to 6    represent low income energy consumers; 7        (10) two members designated by the Illinois Community 8    Action Association to represent local agencies that assist 9    in the administration of this Act; 10        (11) one member designated by the Citizens Utility 11    Board to represent residential energy consumers; 12        (12) (blank); one member designated by the Illinois 13    Retail Merchants Association to represent commercial 14    energy customers; 15        (13) one member designated by the Department to 16    represent independent energy providers; and 17        (14) three members designated by the Mayor of the City 18    of Chicago.19    (c) Designated and appointed members shall serve 2 year 20terms and until their successors are appointed and qualified. 21The designating organization shall notify the chairperson of 22any changes or substitutions of a designee within 10 business 23days of a change or substitution. Members shall serve without 24compensation, but may receive reimbursement for actual costs 25incurred in fulfilling their duties as members of the Council.26    (d) The Council shall have the following duties:   SB3443- 104 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        (1) to monitor the administration of this Act to 2    ensure effective, efficient, and coordinated program 3    development and implementation; 4        (2) to assist the Department in developing and 5    administering rules and regulations required to be 6    promulgated pursuant to this Act in a manner consistent 7    with the purpose and objectives of this Act; 8        (3) to facilitate and coordinate the collection and 9    exchange of all program data and other information needed 10    by the Department and others in fulfilling their duties 11    pursuant to this Act; 12        (4) to advise the Department on the proper level of 13    support required for effective administration of the Act; 14        (5) to provide a written opinion concerning any 15    regulation proposed pursuant to this Act, and to review 16    and comment on any energy assistance or related plan 17    required to be prepared by the Department; 18        (6) to advise the Department on the use of funds 19    collected pursuant to Section 11 of this Act, and on any 20    changes to existing low income energy assistance programs 21    to make effective use of such funds, so long as such uses 22    and changes are consistent with the requirements of the 23    Act.24(Source: P.A. 97-916, eff. 8-9-12.) 25    Section 55. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended   SB3443- 105 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1by changing Section 7-15 as follows: 2    (410 ILCS 705/7-15)3    Sec. 7-15. Loans and grants to Social Equity Applicants. 4    (a) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 5shall establish grant and loan programs, subject to 6appropriations from the Cannabis Business Development Fund, 7for the purposes of providing financial assistance, loans, 8grants, and technical assistance to Social Equity Applicants.9    (b) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 10has the power to: 11        (1) provide Cannabis Social Equity loans and grants 12    from appropriations from the Cannabis Business Development 13    Fund to assist Qualified Social Equity Applicants in 14    gaining entry to, and successfully operating in, the 15    State's regulated cannabis marketplace; 16        (2) enter into agreements that set forth terms and 17    conditions of the financial assistance, accept funds or 18    grants, and engage in cooperation with private entities 19    and agencies of State or local government to carry out the 20    purposes of this Section; 21        (3) fix, determine, charge, and collect any premiums, 22    fees, charges, costs and expenses, including application 23    fees, commitment fees, program fees, financing charges, or 24    publication fees in connection with its activities under 25    this Section;   SB3443- 106 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1        (4) coordinate assistance under these loan programs 2    with activities of the Illinois Department of Financial 3    and Professional Regulation, the Illinois Department of 4    Agriculture, and other agencies as needed to maximize the 5    effectiveness and efficiency of this Act; 6        (5) provide staff, administration, and related support 7    required to administer this Section; 8        (6) take whatever actions are necessary or appropriate 9    to protect the State's interest in the event of 10    bankruptcy, default, foreclosure, or noncompliance with 11    the terms and conditions of financial assistance provided 12    under this Section, including the ability to recapture 13    funds if the recipient is found to be noncompliant with 14    the terms and conditions of the financial assistance 15    agreement; 16        (7) establish application, notification, contract, and 17    other forms, procedures, or rules deemed necessary and 18    appropriate; and19        (8) utilize vendors or contract work to carry out the 20    purposes of this Act.21    (c) Loans made under this Section: 22        (1) shall only be made if, in the Department's 23    judgment, the project furthers the goals set forth in this 24    Act; and 25        (2) shall be in such principal amount and form and 26    contain such terms and provisions with respect to   SB3443- 107 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    security, insurance, reporting, delinquency charges, 2    default remedies, and other matters as the Department 3    shall determine appropriate to protect the public interest 4    and to be consistent with the purposes of this Section. 5    The terms and provisions may be less than required for 6    similar loans not covered by this Section.7    (d) Grants made under this Section shall be awarded on a 8competitive and annual basis under the Grant Accountability 9and Transparency Act. Grants made under this Section shall 10further and promote the goals of this Act, including promotion 11of Social Equity Applicants, job training and workforce 12development, and technical assistance to Social Equity 13Applicants. 14    (e) On or before January 31 of Beginning January 1, 2021 15and each year thereafter, the Department shall annually report 16to the Governor and the General Assembly on the outcomes and 17effectiveness of this Section that shall include the 18following: 19        (1) the number of persons or businesses receiving 20    financial assistance under this Section; 21        (2) the amount in financial assistance awarded in the 22    aggregate, in addition to the amount of loans made that 23    are outstanding and the amount of grants awarded; 24        (3) the location of the project engaged in by the 25    person or business; and26        (4) if applicable, the number of new jobs and other   SB3443- 108 -LRB104 18334 HLH 31774 b1    forms of economic output created as a result of the 2    financial assistance. 3    (f) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 4shall include engagement with individuals with limited English 5proficiency as part of its outreach provided or targeted to 6attract and support Social Equity Applicants.7(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.